CHAPTER I.
The Moro Castle and Sloop-of-War.
The
loftier turrets of the Moro Castle were still
sheathed with gold, from the reflection of the setting
sun, while its embrasures and bastions lower down
its walls, still lower  and the harbor and town, far
beneath, lay in the soft shadows of the first tremulous
twilight. A moment more, and the last sunbeam
disappeared
,
like a blaze suddenly extinguished, from the
topmost pinnacle of the cloud-capped fortress; and the
simultaneous roar of a heavy piece of ordnance, from
the platform of the Castle, told the world of Havana
that the sun had set.
At the signal, there was a general descent of gay
flags, from mast-head and peak, on board full three
hundred vessels, of all nations, that lay at anchor within
sound of the evening gun of the Moro. It was a
brave sight, to behold so many gorgeous ensigns flying
and fluttering in the air; and, seen from the battlements
of the lofty Moro, they appeared like a flock of
flamingoes
,
or birds of paradise, descending and alighting
upon their decks.
The smoke from the discharged gun floated away
horizontally in the air, like a scarf unrolling itself from
its folds, and, reposing at length upon the still air of
evening, cast its blue reflection upon the dark surface
of the harbor; and though it rested level with the ports
of the Castle, to those below, on the vessels' decks it
seemed a cloud in the sky, so elevated was this
Gibraltar
of the west above the surrounding scene.
A young man, in the undress of an officer of the
American Navy, stood listlessly watching this light
cloud, in the gangway of a beautiful sloop-of-war that
lay at anchor within pistol-shot of the Moro,  so near,
indeed, that, to range her lowest battlement with his
eye, he had to elevate his line of vision above the fore
top-gallant yard-arm, the sloop being anchored with
her head towards the rock.
Near the sloop, between her and the rock, and
perpendicularly
under the Castle, was moored a small,
old-fashioned
Spanish or St. Domingo lugger, of about
forty tons, and rigged with two polacca masts, for
carrying
foresail and mainsail, and a dwarf mast, stepped
in the taffrail, on which to rig `a driver,' in running
before the wind. The craft had nothing about her to
attract the particular notice either of seamen or
landsman
,
save her extremely antiquated and unseaworthy
appearance. No one was visible upon her shallow
deck but a negro, with a gray head and a gray
mustache
;
and silent and motionless she lay, in the dark
1*
shadow of the Castle, reflecting from the black,
waveless
flood, her uncouth proportions in singular and
forcible
contrast to the elegant and airy figure of a small
clipper-schooner, that rode at her buoy about a hundred
fathoms farther in the harbor, and nearly in a line with
the American sloop-of-war.
The young officer was idly watching the smoke of
the cannon unroll itself along the air, like a piece of
delicate tinted azure silk thrown out upon a carpet, and
when it reposed above his mast-head, like a canopy,
he let his eye fall upon the lugger, which had only
come to anchor there a few moments before the day
had closed. A smile passed across his handsome
sea-browned
face, as he surveyed her motley appearance.
He then cast his eye beyond the craft, upon the clipper,
and his features lighted up with a more animated and
pleased expression, as he admired her beautiful
proportions
,
and the seaman-like set of her yards, and
the nautical precision which marked every thing about
her.
`There is as much difference, Mr. Forrestal,' said a
reefer, who was following the direction of his officer's
eye, and seemed to understand the nature of his
thoughts, `there is as much difference between those
two craft as between a venerable barn-yard pullet and
a lady's hunting falcon!'
`You have expressed the difference very clearly,
Harry,' responded the officer, turning upon him with a
smile of personal kindness.
`Were you on deck, Mr. Forrestal, when the lugger
I mean the old pullet  set herself down there to
roost, almost on the end of our flying-jib boom?'
`No. Who worked her? I see only a negro on
board.'
`There are three or four others, Spaniards, below, at
their supper of garlic and dried fish! Pah! don't you
smell the air that is infected with their messes? Give
me two marines and the gunner's monkey-boy, Ben,
and I'll cut her out and send her about her business!'
Forrestal laughed, and, tapping the youth, who was
a lad of almost girlish beauty, scarce sixteen,  `I fear
it would bring on a war between us and Spain, Harry,
if there should be blood shed,' he answered, in the
same vein in which his young friend had spoken.
`What think you of your lady's falcon? Would you
like to cut her out?'
`I would like ,' and the youth stopped full and
colored.
`Well, what would you like, Harry?'
`I would like to have you in command of that
clipper-schooner
,
I your first, a picked crew, and sail
away to rescue from her prison that lovely Spanish
princess they say is held in bondage, by the king, her
uncle, in a castle on the Mediterranean!'
`That would be romantic, to say the least. I fear
we should be more likely to share her fate, than do
her a service. When you are ten years older, Harry,
you will express some other wish, in reference to the
schooner, than rescuing a Spanish princess. You
will leave such matters to Don Quixote! Nay,
don't look hurt, my brave boy,  I appreciate your
chivalric feelings, and know they spring from a
generous
and noble nature.'
`I am not hurt, Mr. Forrestal. It was not so much
romance as a deeper feeling that prompted me to utter
this wish,  a feeling that is based on an event which,
perhaps, you do not know of; but which exerts an
influence
over my thoughts, my dreams, and, oftentimes,
my words and actions!'
`What is this circumstance to which you allude,
my dear Henry?' asked the officer, kindly. `I have
heard from the commander that there is an interesting
feature in your history. It is this, doubtless, to which
you allude. The captain once was about to make
it known to me, as I was dining in the cabin with him,
but something interrupted the narrative at its
commencement
.'
`For the three months that I have been sailing in this
ship, you have, sir, shown me very great kindness.'
`You have won it out of me, rather, Harry, by your
cheerfulness and good humor.'
`Yet I have received it from you,' answered the
youth, grateful emotion causing a tremor in his tones.
`I will tell you all I know of myself, and why I had
uppermost in my thoughts a wish seemingly so
fanciful
.
I was born in England, and of a family of wealth,
whatever was its rank; for I have distinct recollection
of being surrounded with all the appurtenances of
opulence in my childhood. I had a sister nearly three
years older than I. Her I remember as if I saw her
face reflected in the deep blue water into which I gaze,
instead of my own. Her soft hazel eyes, her flowing
brown hair, her rosy cheeks, and ripe-red lips and
joyful
laugh, and her sweet tones when she called me
brother, brother!all these, Mr. Forrestal, are
present
to my mind. I can never forget them. I dream
of them all, almost nightly, and the presence of my
sister's voice is ever with me, waking, echoing in the
ear of my heart!'
The officer silently pressed the hand of his young
friend, and as Harry returned the warm and
sympathizing
pressure, Mr. Forrestal felt tears trickle warm
upon his fingers. Both continued for a moment silent.
The distant cry of the Spanish sentry upon the
battlements
above their heads, rung clearly out upon the air;
the rippling sound and measured dip of the oars of a
boat rowed by at a distance; the deep, mellow tolling of
the Cathedral clock in the city; the far-off shout of one
calling to his fellow; the musical song of the seamen
in a neighboring ship getting their anchor, all came
distinct, yet melodiously mingled to their ears. They
listened to the soothing sounds for a few moments, and
the young midshipman, aided by these in subduing
his emotion, thus resumed his narration:
`The abode of my childhood was upon the banks
of a rivera pleasant river, on which small vessels
sailed by; but whither bound, I know not. One day
I was in pursuit of a tame doe, which playfully eluded
my efforts to take it, and drew me along the banks of
the river till I was out of sight of the house. The
house I remember with distinctness, and should
recognize
it at once, should I ever behold it again.
Alarmed, I was turning to run back, when a man,
who was standing by a boat near the shore opposite a
vessel called to me, exhibiting at the same time some
large oranges. As he called me by name, and with a
smile offered me the fruit, fearless of danger and
unsuspicious
,
I went to him. He gave me one of the
oranges, and said to me,
` These two are for your sister. Go home and
tell her there is a person waiting here to give them to
her; and be sure you inform no one but her. '
`I hastened, and found her on the lawn, coming to
seek me. I told her what the strange man had said,
and showed her the orange I had received. With a
laugh and a bound, she started off, and we soon
reached the boat. The man was standing in it; but
on seeing us he got out, and I saw two men rise up
in the boat, and take the oars. As soon as my sister
came near, he advanced towards her, presenting the
orange, and as she timidly extended her hand to take
it, he caught her by the arm, and raising her in his
arms leaped into the boat with her. Isidore shrieked
aloud, when he rudely pressed his hand upon her
mouth. Although I could have been scarcely six
years old at the time, alarmed for my sister's safety,
and indignant at seeing her thus treated, I sprang
forward
,
and clinging to the man, struck him with what
strength I could wield, and demanded my sister. Not
heeding me, the men, on his getting in, pushed off
into the stream, while I still clung weeping and
threatening to him, and endeavoring to take her from
him. In vain he tried to force me to release my hold.
I clung to him with the strength of despair and
determination
.
In the mean while, the men had been
pulling swiftly towards their vessel, and I found, from
what words passed, that I was by no means a welcome
passenger. My sister was the only one they sought,
and doubtless had been laying in wait for.'
`To what conceivable purpose?' asked Forrestal,
manifesting the deepest surprise and interest.
`I am ignorant to this moment. Finding they could
not get rid of me without throwing me overboard,
which was proposed by one of the men, but resisted
by him who held Isidore, they let me remain; and on
reaching the side of the vessel, the two oarsmen tore
me from my affrighted sister, whom I was now
clinging
to, and cast me rudely upon the deck. It was
now twilight, and without delay they got the vessel
under weigh, first locking my sister and myself in the
cabin. Alone together, we cast ourselves in one
another's arms, and wept bitterly, our young hearts
filled with a thousand fears.'
`This is certainly a most extraordinary relation!'
said Forrestal, with emotion, and looks of
astonishment
.
`But do not let me interrupt you. Proceed, for
I am deeply interested.'
`We remained, it seemed to me, a long, long time,
together in the cabin; but it may not have been half
an hour. At length, the man came down, and
unlocking
the door, entered, and frowning fiercely upon
me, he said:
` You deserve to be thrown overboard! You are
one more than I bargained for! '
`But I will hasten with my story. We sailed out
to sea, and day after day we kept on with no land in
sight. I and my sister were at length permitted to
stay on deck, and go about the vessel as we chose;
and the captain (as the man was, who took us forcibly
away from our home,) seemed to take a pleasure in
our society, and gradually my sister conquered her
repugnance and fears; but my hostility was not to be
overcome by any of his efforts to win my confidence.'
`What class of vessel was the one you were in?'
`A brig.'
`Do you remember her name?'
`No, I do not.'
`Nor the captain's?'
`No, sir.'
`Would you recognize him, if you should meet
him again?'
`Yes, as quickly as I would you, sir, were I to leave
you now and meet you to-morrow again.'
`Go on, Harry. I would hear the end of this strange
affair.'
`At length we reached a porta large city. I know
now that it was Boston, but I was not then told its
name. We came near the wharves, and anchored. It
was just at dark. The captain then took me by the
hand, and said;
` Now, boy, bid good-by to your sister, for you
will never see her again! ' and he led me towards
her.
`On hearing these words, I was frantic with grief
and indignation; and instead of embracing her, I
turned to vent my emotions of anger upon the
monster
who had thus torn us from our parents, and was
now to rend us from each other. Finding I would
not take leave of her, he took me forcibly from
the vessel, and placed me in a boat alongside. My
cries were suppressed by his hand pressed against
my face, and in this manner I was held by him
until the men pulled ashore. He then got out with
me, and threatened me, if I opened my lips to make
any further outcry, he would kill me on the spot;
at the same time exhibiting a knife before my eyes.
I suffered him to lead me up into the city, and,
carrying
me to the steps of a large house, he told me to
sit there until he returned. How long I remained
there I am not able to say. I must have very soon
fallen asleep. It was very late, when I was awaked
by a hand upon my shoulder, and a kind voice
addressing
me, and asking me why I was sleeping there
upon the cold steps, with my head resting against the
marble column. Instead of replying, I recollect that
I burst into tears. He took me by the hand, and led
me into the mansion. From that moment, Mr.
Forrestal
,
I had a friend and benefactor. I told him all
my story, and he became to me in place of my father,
and I know used every effort to ascertain who my
parents were. He educated me, and treated me as a
son; and two years ago, when he died, left me the
half of his large fortune. Moreover, he obtained for
me the berth I now hold in the navy, this profession
being my choice, and chosen, perhaps, with some
vague idea that I might one day visit England, and
yet behold again the home, from which I and my sister
were so singularly and mysteriously taken.
`And you have heard nothing of that home, nor
your parents, since?'
`Nothing, sir!'
2
`And your sister?' inquired Forrestal, with slight
hesitation, as if not wishing to move his feelings by
the reminiscence of her.
`From the hour I was taken on shore off India
Wharf, in the small-boat, and left to perish in the streets
of Boston, I have neither seen nor heard from Isidore!'
`This is very strange!'
`It is probable that she has perished, sir,' said Harry,
sadly.
`I trust not,' answered the officer with emphasis.
`I trust you will yet behold her again.'
`It is a faint hope that she lives that both makes me
cheerful and sad; cheerful, at the idea that we may
meet again,sad, at the reflection that if she is living
it may be in great misery and degradation. I have
often imagined her imprisoned in some place by the
seaside, and when I heard of the imprisonment of this
Spanish princess I thought of my poor sister, and that
possibly she may be lingering in some desolate spot,
the prisoner of this monster. It was this feeling which
prompted me to give you the reply I did.'
`And I am very glad you gave it, my dear boy. It
has been the means of opening to me the knowledge
of your strange history, and enlisting my strongest
sympathies and friendship in your behalf.'
`You are very kind, Mr. Forrestal,' answered the
youth, pressing his hand; `you are very kind, sir;
but I fear I shall never behold either my sister or my
mother and my father's home again. I sometimes
think I ought never to smile or be gay; but then the
natural cheerfulness of my spirit will break forth;
though few know, sir, how heavy the heart is beneath.'
`This should not, and I am glad it does not,
altogether
make you depressed. The world is fair still,
and has many sunny scenes; and perhaps yet all this
mystery that hangs around you will be cleared away,
and you will find the remainder of your years happy
and unshadowed by a sorrow.'
`I have little hope, sir. If I knew that Isidore was
dead, Mr. Forrestal, I should be less unhappy; but the
consciousness that she may be living, and living in
the power of that dark and evil man, at times almost
makes me frantic.'
`Was this man a foreigner? Yet, as you were so
young you could not tell.'
`Though I was young, and at the time could not
form a correct judgment upon what occurred and was
visible around me, yet so vividly are those things and
events impressed upon my memory, that I can look
back upon them and judge of them with my present
experience
.
In this way I am able to say that the vessel
was a brig, for now I know that the form of the vessel
that was engraven upon my mind then, belongs to a
vessel of this class. In this way I can speak with
accuracy of what otherwise I might be incapable of
describing.'
`Your history is a very singular one, my dear
Harry
.
Do you recollect your family name?' he asked,
quickly.
`No; I only remember that my name was Henry.
Such my parents, such my sister, called me.'
`And her name was Isidore? By this time, if she
be alive, she must be in her nineteenth year.'
`Yes, Mr. Forrestal. But I shall never see her alive
again; or I would rather know her to be dead, than
find her in a condition of degradation; for this man
would be guilty of any wickedness.'
`What was his appearance?'
`Large of stature, with light long hair, blue eyes,
and heavy brows. His voice was harsh and his
bearing
stern. Yet I think he had the air of a gentleman;
certainly he was not a low ruffian.'
`It is more extraordinary still! But why do you
start? what ails thee, boy?'
`That voicethat man!'
`Who?what man?'
`On the lugger! see!'
Before Forrestal could arrest him, or anticipate the
young midshipman's movements, he had sprung from
the gangway into the dark waters below.
CHAPTER II.
The Recognition.
Forrestal
stood an instant transfixed with surprise
at this sudden movement of his young friend, and then
believing that the memory and recital of his sad
history
had turned his brain, he gave aloud the startling
cry, `a man overboard!' and sprang into the water to
rescue him. The cry was taken up simultaneously by
others on deck, and the quarter-master, who was
standing
near the wheel, ran aft and cut away the life-buoy,
while the officer of the deck, seeing Forrestal also
plunge in, leaped into the third cutter which was at the
quarter davits, the boats being all hoisted up, and
followed
by a part of its crew was lowered into the
water.
Forrestal, however, reached Harry as he was
swimming
,
regardless of the cries and of his presence,
towards
the lugger, with the outlay of every sinew.
`Come, my dear boy,' said his friend, with a kindly
smile as he grasped him firmly by the arm, `you must
not escape from the ship this way!'
`But itdon't detain me, good Forrestal! I
must'
`But, Harry, you
must
return to the sloop! What
can have driven you overboard in this mad fashion?
Here is the cutter right upon us! You must get in
with me, and then, once on board and in your warm
hammock, you may talk. Do n't resist me, Harry.'
But the young midshipman seeing the boat almost
upon them, loosened Forrestal's hold and dove deep
out of sight.
`He is swimming shoreward under the surface,'
cried the lieutenant, standing up in the boat and
watching
his course beneath the water. `Forrestal take hold
of the gunwale, and, men, give a couple of short
strokes and we shall reach him as he rises.'
The cutter glided on about twenty feet when the
head of the youth, as he ascended to the top of the
water, struck with violence under her starboard bow.
Forrestal, who was holding by one hand to one of the
heart-shaped `fenders' of the boat and swimming with
the other, immediately caught him beneath the arms
and raised him out of the water so that those in the boat
could grasp him, when he was immediately lifted in,
but insensible, from the blow he had received.
Forrestal
getting in after him, took him in his arms, and
the cutter was immediately pulled back under the
sloop's quarter, the davits hooked, and she was hoisted
to her place with all in her.
Harry was conveyed by Forrestal to his own
hammock
,
and there, by the aid of the surgeon, every means
were used to resuscitate him; but it was three hours
before he showed any signs of returning sensibility.
`That was a severe blow, Mr. Forrestal,' said the
surgeon, who was holding his pulse, and watching
returning
life.'
`Yes, doctor. If I had not caught him in my
arms as I did, he would have sunk to the bottom like
lead!'
`Can you account in any way for his throwing
himself into the water?'
`No; unless from the excess of grief at the
remembrance
of his unhappy fate, and that of his lost sister;
but I will not now explain what I mean; briefly, he
was, in childhood, mysteriously separated from an
only sister, whose present fate is a source of constant
anxiety to him; and it was while he was recounting
to me some of the facts connected with her separation
from him, he suddenly made a leap into the water!'
`It is very strange. His brain, perhaps, was for the
moment a little unsettled,' said the surgeon, shaking
his head.
`I fear so,' responded Forrestal, sorrowfully. `Poor
Harry!  he opens his eyes, sir!'
`Yes, he is fast coming to. Please hand me that
lamp from the table, Mr. Forrestal.' The surgeon
placed the light before Harry's eyes, and looked closely
into them. The youth closed them slowly, and heavily
sighed.
`The expression is soft and natural,' answered the
doctor, looking at the lieutenant, who was watching
this act with intense anxiety. `I see nothing to
indicate
insanity.'
`Thank God!' exclaimed the generous-hearted
officer.
`Mr. Forrestal!' murmured the lips of the youth.
`I am here, dear Harry!' answered the officer,
bending over to catch his words.
Harry opened his eyes, smiled faintly, and sought to
grasp the hand of his friend.
`You are better, Harry?'
`Yes; I feel much better! Am I not in your
state-room
,
Mr. Forrestal?' he asked, looking round, and
trying to recollect himself.
`Yes, Harry. I am glad to see you are reviving.
We have all been very anxious about you.'
`Thank you!' he answered, pressing his hand
warmly. `I am quite well now. You need not hold
my pulse, Doctor Fosdick. I shall soon be quite well,
Mr. Forrestal.'
`Well, Harry?'
`How long have I been here?'
`Four hours, nearly.'
Instantly the cheek of the youth became flushed.
`I wish to say a word to you. Bend down!  no,
you need not; you see I can rise and sit up. There,
you perceive how well I am, doctor. Please let me
say a word alone to Mr. Forrestal!'
He spoke with such earnestness and emotion, that
the surgeon hesitated a moment, placed his hand
upon his pulse, and then laid it upon his temple.
`Doctor, I am quite well now. If I am worse, Mr.
Forrestal shall call you,' he said, with earnestness.
The surgeon took a second keen glance into his eyes,
and then said, with a smile,
`Well, I will let you have a few words with your
friend; but I forbid you talking much. I hold you
responsible, Mr. Forrestal.'
`I will see that he does not say much, for I know
rest and quiet are most needful for him; and as he
spoke, he with a gentle hand put back the chestnut
curls from the young man's forehead, with the tender,
soothing air, which a brother would show towards a
loving and beloved sister.
Harry listened till he heard the doctor's step cross to
the farther door of the ward-room, and then with both
hands he took hold of the hand of Forrestal, which lay
in his, and said, in a deep, trembling tone,
`Mr. Forrestal, you must think I have acted very
strangely. I will explain to you.'
`Not now  to-morrow. It is near midnight. Seven
bells are now striking. You should sleep, dear Harry.
To-morrow you may tell me all.'
`I conceive that I must have sunk or fainted in the
water after I dived away from you,' he said, as if all
at once reflecting upon being where he was. `Do I
not owe you my life, sir? How was it?'
`As you came up to the surface, your head struck
under the bows of the cutter with violence, and the
shock rendered you insensible.'
`That accounts for my head  for the great pain
in it.'
`You must be quiet, my dear Harry.'
`No. Let me first thank you for my life: for I
know it must have been you who saved me, when I
was rendered insensible,' said Harry, looking up into
his face with that generous emotion, which sweet
gratitude alone can impress upon the countenance.
`Well, and this renders you more dear to me.'
`I am so happy having such a friend as you a
sir. But I must tell you what caused me to spring
overboard as I did. But first, is the lugger anchored
there?'
`I do not know. I suppose so, unless she weighed
with the tide.'
`O, see sir, see!'
`I will, Harry, but '
`Do n't hesitate, but sit down, and I will first tell
you, for if she is not there now,
all
is lost! Do you
know, sir,' he continued, with the most excited manner,
his cheek flushed and his eye kindling, `do you know,
sir, that I saw
that man!
'
`What man?' asked Forrestal, now quite
convinced
that poor Harry's brain was truly affected.
There was no doubt that his thoughts were yet a little
unsteady, from the effects of the blow he had received,
but they were faithful to the one subject he had now
upon his mind.
`The man that carried my sister and myself on board
the brig in the river, when we were children!' he
answered
,
with great earnestness.
`Saw him, Harry?' asked Forrestal, with an
expression
upon his face, that told how sadly he was
convinced that the mind of his young friend was
wandering
wandering fitfully upon the past.
`Yes, Mr. Forrestal. It was that which made me
spring overboard; for I felt, that if I did not reach him
then, I should, perhaps, never see him again. I
immediately
leaped into the water to swim to the lugger,
with the purpose of seizing him, and demanding my
sister!'
Forrestal looked a moment on the face of his young
friend, with a gaze of mingled surprise and
incredulity
.
There was no sign of insanity in his eyes,
whatever
there might be in his words; though his manner
was deeply excited and earnest.
`Harry,' said he, seriously, and fixing a steady,
observant
gaze upon him; `do you mean to say you saw
a man on board the lugger, who resembled the
individual
who took your sister away?'
`I saw the
very man
, Mr. Forrestal,' answered Harry,
with very great positiveness.
`On the deck of the lugger?'
`Yes, sir. While I was talking with you, did you
not see a man, with bushy grey hair, reddish
whiskers
,
high, broad shoulders, and tall in stature, come
out of the cuddy?'
`Yes, I noticed him, and was struck with his savage
appearance!'
`That was the man, sir. The moment he appeared
in full view on the lugger's deck, I recognized him;
for his image has never been absent from my thoughts.
As soon as I recognized that it was
he
, without
saying
a word to you, I impulsively leaped into the
water.'
`But, my dear Harry, it is eleven years since you
saw him, and then you were but six or seven years
of age. Time must have changed the man who
beguiled
Isidore from her home, so that now you would
not be able to identify him.'
`This man I could recognize and identify had he
reached eighty years, sir.
It is the man!
O, sir,
will you believe me, and have him arrested, that I may
once more behold my sister, or know what has become
of her?'
`My dear Harry, this seems too extraordinary a
circumstance to be the truth. Yet I will believe you,
for nothing but a positive recognition of the man can
account for your extraordinary conduct in leaping from
the gangway into the water to swim to the lugger; I
thought you crazy.'
`Thanks, thanks, sir, for believing me. I am not
crazy, save with joy and hope. Haste, sir, to the deck,
and see if the lugger is still there; and if she is, let me
board her with you. He must not escape from me,
Mr. Forrestal. I must demand my sister of him.'
`He shall not escape, dear boy. Whether he be
the man or not, he shall be brought before you, and
you shall be satisfied.'
`The lugger, if she is not moved, lies in our power,
and nothing will be easier, dear Mr. Forrestal, than to
take him from her and bring him on board. Oh! let
me go on deck.'
`You are not yet sufficiently recovered, Harry. It
will endanger your health to be exposed to the night
air. In the morning, you shall be on deck. Here is
the surgeon, with his finger up.'
`Ah, Lieutenant Forrestal, you have had too long a
talk with my patient. You see his cheek is like a
peony, and I dare say his pulse is full one hundred
and ten. No, it is but ninety. This is not so bad as
I feared.'
`Please remain with him, doctor; I will soon
return
,'
said Forrestal; and the next instant he was on
the gun deck. He hurried to the gangway to look for
the lugger; but as the ebb tide had swung the vessel
of war round with her head in an opposite direction,
he did not think of the fact until he saw the towers
and roofs of the city in the distance, instead of the
Castle, which was now behind him. The lugger, it
3
will be remembered, lay in the shadow of the rock,
upon which the Moro Castle was built. He crossed
the ship's deck to the gangway, and with a quick,
searching gaze, looked for the lugger where she had
lain at sundown.
After a few moments' observation, he was satisfied
that she was no longer there. This conviction was a
deep disappointment to him, for he had come to a firm
belief that Harry was right.
`Mr. Veryl!' he said to a young reefer, who had
been walking up and down the waist smoking a
finely-flavored
Havana cigar, but who had now arrested
himself in his mechanical promenade to watch the
hurried movements of Lieutenant Forrestal; `do you
know what has become of the lugger that lay at anchor
half a cable's length from us in shore at sunset?'
`She weighed at the turn of the tide, sir,' answered
the reefer, touching his cap, and removing his cigar
from his lips.
`When was that?'
`About the second bell, sir.'
`At nine o'clock; and now it is twelve! She has
been gone three hours. Did she stand out of the
harbor?'
`Yes, sir. I was leaning over the
hammock-nettings
watching her movements; for at one time, as the
wind baffled, I thought she would fall aboard of us.
Yet they managed her well.'
`Did you see many men on her deck?'
`Five, sir.'
`Spaniards?'
`I could not tell in the dark, though I heard Spanish
spoken, and that too by one who had an English
tongue in his head.'
`Are you sure that it was an Englishman?' asked
Forrestal, quickly.
`Or American, sir,' responded Mr. Veryl, replacing
his cigar a moment, to keep it alive, and then
removing
it.
`I know you speak the language well, Mr. Veryl;
but it requires a nice ear to detect Spanish, when
spoken by an English tongue!'
`I cannot mistake the accent, sir. The man,
whoever
he was, was the skipper of the lugger; for the
orders all came from him. He did not speak loud, but
I could hear distinctly his words.'
`And the lugger stood out of the harbor?'
`Yes, sir.'
`How is the wind?'
`About south by east, and is outside five or six knot
breeze, I should think, sir, from the way the lugger
showed her paces after clearing the harbor.'
`Then you watched her?'
`For about a mile I could distinguish her; but she
rapidly went out of sight.'
`What course did she steer?'
`I should think about northeast, sir.'
`Thank you, Veryl.'
Forrestal then remained a moment in deep reflection,
while Veryl embraced the opportunity to revive his
expiring cigar, which his courtesy  for Mr. Veryl was
a very fastidiously polite reefer, of eighteen years
would not suffer him to smoke while addressed by his
superior officer.
`Did you notice if any one left her before she
weighed
?'
asked Forrestal:
`No, sir, I did not. I was only induced to give the
craft my attention from hearing their noise in getting
their anchor.'
Forrestal made no further remark, but walked aft at
a quick pace, and descended into the cabin.
`What can be in the wind now?' asked another
midshipman, who had heard part of the conversation,
and the inquiries of the lieutenant.
`That I can't tell, unless the lugger has been
bucaneering
,'
answered Veryl, speaking with his cigar
in his mouth, and with his laced cap thrown back from
his brow with an air.
`It is n't that! Forrestal has something in his head
for her. She has been doing some mischief; or,
perhaps
he wants her to help him on this cruise that is
whispered about.'
`It may be so. But the clipper-schooner is no doubt
to be ordered on that duty. This was the rumor in
the steerage at supper, you know, Rogers!'
`Steerage rumors are not bulletins. But there is
something in the wind all round; and we shall know,
before either of us are twenty-four hours older,
something
more both about this pretty clipper under our
quarter, as well as this lugger that has spread her black
wings and flown seaward.'
`What do you imagine the clipper-schooner has
been ordered out from Baltimore for?' asked Veryl,
taking a Bermuda grass case from his side pocket, and
deliberately drawing forth a fresh cigar. `Take one'
Rogers.'
`Thank you, Fred, I smoke only
rapellitos
,'
responded
the reefer, a round-faced, short young gentleman,
with a bob-tarpaulin, cocked knowingly over his
larboard
eye; `and, besides, I have a fresh quid of pig in
just now. Well, I can't tell what she is here for,
unless it is, as the first luff was overheard to say, to
cruise in among the Bahama Keys, where the sloop
wont go.'
`That is my opinion, though nothing certain has
come out. Every thing is kept so close under hatches
in the big cabin.'
`We shall know soon; for the schooner was
provisioned
with fresh tuck from shore this afternoon, and
that means anchor a-weigh and blue water!'
`Yes. And we are to sail too, soon, if that is a
sign, for we had at least two bullocks in beef come
aboard to-day, and vegetables and fruit enough to
freight a Yankee skipper. What a long craft that
schooner is!'
`A picture,' answered Rogers, changing his quid
from his right cheek to his left, and taking a closer
view of the little vessel, that lay quietly at anchor a
little ways off the starboard quarter. `I would like to
take command of her myself!'
`I should n't care to take a holyday cruise in her, if
I thought we should fall in with some of these
bucaneering
wreckers, and especially the fellow they talk
so much about, that holds out the false lights that lately
have wrecked three of our best merchantmen.'
`That would be a spirited cruise, Fred. I would
like the capturing of that fellow, and I believe Old
Par has something of this sort in his eye.'
3 *
`Eight bells,' cried the officer of the deck.
`Eight bells,' repeated Rogers, passing the words
forward, and at the same instant the deep-toned ship's
bell tolled out, in quick double-strokes, the hour of
midnight.
`I am not sorry to turn in, Fred,' said Rogers, as he
prepared to dodge into the steerage, as the relief came
on deck.
`I shall wait up a few minutes, for I want to see
what Forrestal will have to say when he comes out of
the cabin.'
`Hark! what a ringing of eight bells there is!'
They both paused a moment, to listen to the
wild and startling sounds that broke upon the night
from every part of the harbor. From ship to ship the
hoarse midnight call resounded, followed by three
strokes of their bells in every variety of key, from that
of the small war-schooner to that of the
ship-of-the-line
;
while, mingling with it, came swelling solemnly
upon the breeze, the deep tones of the Cathedral clock
in the city, slowly sounding from its lofty tower; and,
far up in the sky, as it were, was heard the shrill cry
of the Spanish sentinel, upon the Castle battlement,
proclaiming `All is well.'
In a few minutes the sounds, one after another,
ceased, and the reefer was about to disappear to
throw himself into his hammock, when Veryl said,
warningly,
`Do not make a noise, Rogers, if you can help it, as
Harry is, you know, in Forrestal's cot, and only a
bulk-head separates you from him.'
`True; and what, Veryl, is the matter with Harry?
Do you suppose he was crazy when he went
overboard
in that style?'
`I can't tell. It is a mystery to me.'
`The doctor says he must have been a little out.'
`I should think he was a little
in
,' answered Veryl,
with a slight smile at his pun.
`Good, Veryl. But it is too bad to joke upon
Harry's
ducking. You would make a pun upon your
grandmother's coffin!'
`To be sure I should, if she had a bad cold!'
`There, you are at it again! Good night.' And the
reefer disappeared down into the steerage, and in two
minutes was sound asleep in his hammock, so lightly
do the cares and events of life lay upon the minds of
young sailors.
Veryl stood a moment on the spot where his friend
had left him, and then advanced a few paces aft and
remained solicitously looking at the entrance of the
cabin, as if expecting the re-appearance of Forrestal;
for he hoped he might yet hear something further from
him in reference to the interest he had taken in the
departure of the lugger. But after waiting some five
minutes, and hearing nothing further from him, he
turned and reluctantly descended to his hammock.
Before throwing himself into it, he went to see how
Harry was. He found him, with the doctor seated by
his cot.
`I thought it was Mr. Forrestal,' said Harry, in a
tone of disappointment. `Have you seen him, Veryl?'
`Yes, he came on deck, and then went into the
captain's
cabin.'
`Do you  did you  that is  is the lugger ?'
`You must keep quiet, Harry,' said the doctor,
firmly. `You must not talk. Pulse up to
ninety-seven
,
and hard.'
`I will not remain here, doctor!' answered Harry,
very positively. `I am as well as you are! I must
know
and
see!
' he said, earnestly.
`You shall know and see, but you must get well
first,' answered the surgeon, kindly, but firmly laying
his hand upon him to detain him, for he had sprung
to his feet.
`The lugger,  is it there still, Veryl?' he asked,
with singular earnestness.
`No. It weighed three hours ago, and put to sea,'
answered Veryl, not a little surprised at the interest
taken also by him, in this obscure craft.
`Gone! Then he is lost forever!' cried Harry,
almost
with a shriek; and burying his face in his hands,
he fell back nearly insensible upon the cot.
`He is surely crazy,' said Doctor Fosdick, with
sympathy. `It is a plain case of madness, Mr. Veryl.
He must lose, at the least, sixteen ounces of blood,
without delay.'
`Poor Harry!' said Veryl, sadly. `Such a noble
fellow!'
`Poor boy! mad as a March hare!' answered the
good-hearted doctor, in a husky voice; and wiping
the rim of one of his glasses, which had caught a tear
that was stealing down his brown cheek, he replaced
them upon the bridge of his long nose, and prepared
to bleed him.
CHAPTER III.
The Clipper.
Forrestal
, on descending from the deck, stopped
in a sort of vestibule or hall, at the foot of the stairs,
from which a richly-gilt mahogany door led into the
main cabin occupied by the commander of the
sloop-of-war
.
He tapped at the door twice before he was
heard, when he was ordered to `come in.'
`Ah, Mr. Forrestal, it is you,' said Captain
Parmenter
,
who, wrapped in a brocade dressing-gown and his
feet thrust into Persian slippers, was seated by a table
that was draped with a scarlet cloth, and strewn with
books and papers and partly covered by a very elegant
inlaid writing-desk. The cabin in which he was seated
was spacious and panneled with rose-wood and maple,
polished in the highest manner, and relieved by beads
of burnished gold, and pilasters of marble placed at
intervals, surmounted by gilded Corinthian capitals.
Though small in dimensions, nothing could be more
magnificent than this nautical saloon. On either side
of it a door opened into a state-room containing French
couches overarched by damask canopies. The
furniture
of this tasteful cabin consisted of two lounges
covered with thick crimson velvet, and two luxurious
easy-chairs, with the circular table at which the occupant
was seated in one of them. A large mirror occupied
the space above the transum between the two
dead-lights
,
and over the table hung a very elegant bronze
lamp in the form of a nautilus.
`I have taken the liberty to intrude upon you, sir,
but'
`No intrusion, Mr. Forrestal,' said Captain Parmenter,
with the courtesy of a perfectly bred man. `You are
so assiduous in your duties on deck, that it is rarely I
have the pleasure of a voluntary visit from you; besides,
I was just thinking about sending my servant to you.
Be seated, sir! How is poor young Carneil? The
doctor was in awhile since, and said, that although he
was in no danger of his life, he was still in the same
state in which I left him two hours ago!'
`He is now, I am happy to say, sir, quite out of
danger. He has not only recovered his senses, but
spoken rationally, and seems to be quite free from any
alarming symptoms!'
`Was he rational, quite? Did he betray no signs
of that painful condition of the mind which the doctor
has hinted at as the cause of his leaping into the water?'
`No, sir. It was from me the doctor got this idea,
for I was the only one present and conversing with
him when he made the plunge. I then believed, and
expressed to the doctor my opinion, that it was an act
of temporary insanity.'
`But you do not think so, now?'
`No, sir.'
`It is very strange what should have led him to do
it, said Captain Parmenter, thoughtfully; but I am glad
the poor boy is doing well. He shall be removed to
my cabin.'
`He is quite comfortable where he is, sir, and I think
will be on deck in the morning, in his usual health.'
`Well, that is favorable. Now, Mr. Forrestal, let
me talk with you about this clipper-cruise. I was just
about to send for you for the purpose.'
Forrestal was burning with impatience to
communicate
to his commanding officer what was on his mind,
and which had brought him so abruptly into his
presence
at that late hour; but the courtesies of the service
rendered him silent till he should have first heard what
the captain had to say to him; and he moreover
secretly
trusted, that what he had to propose might
forward
that which he himself had in view in reference
to the lugger.
`You are aware, Mr. Forrestal,' said the captain in
a serious manner, `that I have in view a cruise on the
Bahamas, and I have already made known to you that
the clipper-schooner, just arrived from the States, is to
act as a tender.'
`Yes, sir.'
`It is my intention, as I hinted to you this morning,
to place you in command of her, having confidence in
your ability as well as in your judgment and discretion.
Forrestal bowed, and Captain Parmenter resumed
in the same quiet, conversational tone.
`My orders are to cruise between Nassau and the
Hole-in-the-Wall, and endeavor to ascertain the haunts
of the wreckers, (or rather now to be called
pirates
, for
their late deeds,) who were guilty of plundering the
packet-ships and robbing the passengers, of which so
much has been said lately; and I have particular
instructions
to endeavor to ascertain where, by what
means, and by whom the false decoy-light near Abaco
has been displayed, by which two of these vessels were
deceived and cast away. My orders came out in the
clipper, though I had some intimation from the
Department
,
that I was to be ordered on some such service,
and hence my delay here. You have not been on
board the clipper?'
`No, sir, not yet. She is a very fine-looking craft,
and must sail well.'
`She is. I am told by the masters'-mate, who brought
her out, that she skips over the waves like a gull. She
draws but eight feet, though her length is so very great
for her breadth of beam, she looks twice her tonnage,
which is but one hundred and ten!'
`When do you weigh, sir?'
`At noon, to-morrow.'
`Have you'
Here Forrestal checked himself, and appeared
embarrassed
what to say, as if he was about to ask
something
that he shrunk from proposing.
`Why do you hesitate, Mr. Forrestal?' asked the
captain, blandly; `I have seen you have had something
on your mind all along while I have been talking: out
with it, sir!'
`I was about to ask if you had any objections to my
getting under weigh with the schooner to-night?'
`To-night! Mr. Forrestal? To-night! and
alone?
'
`Pardon me, sir, I should first have explained to you
my motive. It is connected with poor Harry's leap
into the water!'
`Let me hear it, sir,' answered the commander, with
a look of surprise and curiosity. `How your sailing
4
to-night can have any thing to do with Carneil's affair,
I cannot conceive. But I am curious to hear.'
`You are, I believe, sir, acquainted with his singular
history, Captain Parmenter?'
`Yes; and once began to relate it to you.'
`He has told me himself, sir. We were standing
together, at sunset, enjoying the beautiful harbor-scene
around us, when from some circumstance that occurred
he began to give me a relation of the events of his
earlier life. It was a strange and interesting story, to
which I listened; and I need not assure you, sir, to
whom these extraordinary facts are known, that I
became
most deeply interested.'
`You could not be otherwise than so, Mr. Forrestal,'
said Captain Parmenter, in a sad tone of voice. `I
never think of the affair without pity. What do you
imagine was the motive of that fellow, who abducted
the lovely little girl, his sister? To me the whole
subject is one of painful mystery. Harry has deeply
interested me, not only from the peculiar circumstances
connected with his life, but from the many noble traits
of character in mind and heart he daily developes; I
never knew a youth who promises so fairly to be heard
in the world. That he has come of good blood, is
plain from his spirited head, his proud brow and eye,
as well as from the delicate, yet by no means feminine,
shape of his hands and limbs. He is a capital sailor,
and seems to take to the sea by instinct; and I would
not hesitate to bet, if there was any way of proving it,
that his father lived longer on the blue water than on
the green land. But what is your opinion of this
abduction?'
`I can form none satisfactorily. If
both
children had
been desired, then there might have been some motive
based upon property, which, if they had remained, they
would have inherited.'
`I have thought of the same idea, and the same
objection
,
of one only being taken away, voluntarily
occurred
!
I would give a thousand dollars to get at the
bottom of this mystery.'
`I think we are likely to, sir,' said Forrestal, with
animation.
`How? In what way?' demanded the captain, with
eager inquiry.
`I have told you that Harry was relating to me his
story, as we were standing together on the side of the
ship looking towards the Moro.'
`Well.'
`Between us and the Moro lay at anchor a small
lugger, that dropped down there a little before sunset.'
`I remember seeing her, and thought she looked
amazingly like one of the Bahama wreckers; and I
thought I would in the morning send for the skipper,
and see what I could get out of him touching the
doings of some of his brethren on the Banks. But
what of him?'
`Harry had just ended his recital by saying, in reply
to a question from me, that if he saw that man who
took him from home, he should recognize him, under
any disguise. We both had our eyes turned in the
direction of the shallop at the moment, and all at once,
while he was speaking, he uttered an extraordinary
cry, and plunged instantly from the gangway into the
water. Supposing he must have been seized with a
momentary madness caused by grief and despair, I
plunged in after him, and we were so fortunate as to
rescue him, though not without injury.'
`Yes, Mr. Forrestal, and you deserve great praise
for your act. But I am impatient to hear more; for
I see you have something strange yet to tell connected
with the affair.'
`Yes. Until about a quarter of an hour ago, when
Harry came to himself, I believed that he had jumped
overboard from the impulse of temporary insanity!'
`And what was the cause, Mr. Forrestal?' asked
Captain Parmenter, earnestly.
`You will scarce believe what I am to say, for I
was first incredulous myself, until firmly convinced by
Harry's positive manner and the sincerity of his air, that
he was right! He declares positively that the cause of
his conduct was the recognizing in a man on board
the shallop as his eye glanced that way, the features
and form of the very individual who had taken him
and his sister from their childhood's home! That he
obeyed the first impulse of his feelings and leaped
overboard to swim to the shallop!'
`Can this be possible, Mr. Forrestal?' exclaimed
the captain, springing from his seat, in the strongest
excitement.
`Harry positively asserts that he is not mistaken;
that the features of this man, who tore him from his
native land, are engraven upon his memory, and that
the man he beheld on the deck of the shallop is the
same man!'
`This is most wonderful!'
`It is, indeed, sir!'
`Let me see Carneil! I will question him! But
what is this confusion in the companion-way? Here
he is in person, and pursued by the doctor!' he cried,
as Harry burst into the cabin and threw himself upon
Forrestal with a perfect abandonment. `What is
this? Doctor Fosdick, explain, sir!' demanded the
captain, as the surgeon arrested himself in the door
and stood there wistfully eyeing his patient, yet afraid
to intrude into the cabin, his right hand armed with a
lancet and his left flourishing a strip of linen bandage.
`Sir, my patient has eloped and I pursued him,'
answered the discomfited medicine-man.
`Mr. Forrestal, he would have bled me, and I am
perfectly well!' cried Harry.
`I had no sooner pricked the cuticle of his arm with
my lancet point, Captain Parmenter, than he came to,
and was up the steerage ladder in a trice. He is mad,
sir, stark mad, or he would quietly have suffered
himself
to be bled!'
`That is no good proof, doctor. I will vouch for
the sanity of my young friend. Let him remain with
me to-night, I will be responsible. Good night,
doctor
!'
The surgeon took the polite bow of the commander
as a civil request for him to retire, and wishing the
two officers a `good night,' in return, he closed the
cabin door and departed to his own state-room.
`Now, my dear boy,' said Captain Parmenter,
kindly, `we both know, Mr. Forrestal and myself, that
you are
not
mad! The doctor we will suffer to
remain
,
for the present, in his own opinion. Mr.
Forrestal
has told me what led you to leap into the water,
4*
and it is very naturally explained under the
circumstances
.
I am glad you appear now so well over
your sad accident of hitting the boat. Now, be
composed
,
Harry, for I see your soul is almost ready to
fly out at your lips!'
`But, sir, the shallop has weighed!'
`Weighed!'
`Yes, sir. This is what has roused me again.
O, sir, if he now escapes us I may never see him
again!'
`You did not tell me the lugger had gone from her
anchorage, Mr. Forrestal.'
`I was just about to do so when Harry came in as
he did. This was my motive in desiring to put to
sea to-night, that I might overtake her!'
`Oh! good,
good
Forrestal!' cried Harry, almost
embracing his friend; and then his eyes, fixed on his
commander, hung upon his answer.
`Harry, let me first ask you if you are sure you are
not mistaken in this man's identity?'
`No, sir. I had no sooner fixed my eyes upon him
than I knew him! He was not much changed, save
that he looked older and grayer, sir!'
`You are positive!'
`It was the man, sir, the
very
man!' cried Harry,
with tearful earnestness. `O, sir, if you would let
the sloop get  but I am of too little importance
for a sloop-of-war to weigh anchor on my account!'
`The sloop need not go in pursuit. Does any one
of the watch know which course she took after getting
an offing, Mr. Forrestal? Was she seen?'
`She stood to the north and east; so Veryl told me,
as he was watching her when she moved out from her
moorings. She sailed with the first ebb and has been
gone near four hours now!'
`I am satisfied you are right, Harry, or you could
not look and speak so positively, not to allude to the
fact of your springing overboard so readily and
impulsively
.
I shall therefore act accordingly. The
clipper-schooner
that is anchored near us is to act as a tender
to the sloop in a cruise, and Mr. Forrestal is to take
command of her. Both vessels were to sail together
to-morrow noon; but as you
are
of great importance,
my dear boy, notwithstanding your modest doubts, the
schooner shall weigh as soon as Mr. Forrestal gets on
board of her. Do not look so pale, Harry. You may
accompany him, for nothing could be done without
you, you know! Now get your kit ready, if you feel
strong enough; if not, the steward shall help you!'
`I can get together what things I shall want in a
few minutes, sir. I am well and strong, now that I
know we are going in chase of the shallop. I do not
know what to say to you for your goodness, Captain
Parmenter!'
`Say nothing, my dear boy; only catch and bring
that fellow back safe under hatches, and I will have
the screws ready to clap on him, to make him confess
all his diabolical villainy!'
Harry left the cabin, his bosom swelling with new
and strange feelings, to prepare for a transfer to the
clipper, while the steward, by his order, began to get
ready Mr. Forrestal's chest, with his nautical books,
charts, quadrants, spy-glass, &c.
`Now, Mr. Forrestal,' said Captain Parmenter, as
Harry left them together, `you will enter upon and
pursue this chase with all diligence. There is no
question but that Harry has, by God's good providence,
seen the very man! Providence will aid you in
carrying
through the matter to a successful issue, if Harry
has been right in the outset. I shall put to sea
to-morrow
noon at the ebb. If I am correct in my
suspicions
this fellow is a wrecker, and has probably
been in port here to dispose of the more valuable
portions
of cargo he has either picked up on the beach or
pilfered from some wreck. If Harry's man is indeed
in her, she is more likely to be one of the very
piratical
fellows I am ordered to hunt out of their
hiding-places
among the Keys. The shallop will, therefore,
doubtless take you in the direction of the Banks, as
Veryl says she steered a northerly course after getting
outside. I shall also stand for the Banks to-morrow.
I will give you full time for your cruise  twenty
days  and at the end of this period I shall
rendezvous
at Key-West, where you will then meet me and
report progress. If you are successful in capturing
the shallop in less time, and this man is on board, you
will join me either at Nassau or in the neighborhood
of Abaco, where I shall cruise for several days. You
have now my instructions! You can get on board as
soon as you please!'
`I will not delay a moment, sir,' answered
Forrestal
,
taking up his naval cap from the ottoman.
`The manner in which this skipper has stolen off,
leads me to suspect that he must have recognized
Harry while he was in the water!'
`I have been thinking the very same thing, sir,'
answered Forrestal, arresting his hand upon the knob
of the door, which he had partly opened when the
captain spoke. `Yet there must have been such an
alteration in Harry that I question if he could have
identified him!'
`Perhaps this man  and I think on reflection it is
more than probable, perhaps he has kept this youth in
his eye from the first. It is not likely he would
willingly
lose sight of him altogether. He must have
known that he did not perish on the steps, and that
Mr. Carneil took him in. It appears to me that he
must have kept his eye upon him, and I should not be
surprised if his dropping down here from the inner
harbor and anchoring so close to us had something to
do with his knowledge that Harry was on board the
sloop!'
`Such a supposition is a very natural one, sir; and
if he anchored here with any designs upon him, he
would very naturally move again as soon as he well
could, conscious of having been recognized, and
fearful
of the consequences when Harry, whom he must
have seen, was taken on board insensible, should
come to himself and give the reason for his conduct!'
`You are right, Mr. Forrestal, I am now firmly
convinced
in my own mind that Harry saw the true man.
This suggestion explains the whole. When shall you
weight?'
`Within twenty minutes!'
`God give you success. Good-by, sir,' added the
captain, shaking his hand. `And you, Harry,
good-by
too! Are you all ready, my dear boy?'
`Yes, Captain Parmenter!'
`Then God bless you! Good night!'
The captain accompanied them to the deck, and in
a quiet manner they put off from the sloop, and in
three minutes stood on the deck of the clipper. In
five more her anchor was atrip, her sails were loosed
and sheeted home, and, gracefully swinging round
with her prow to the sea, the beautiful vessel went
flying ocean-ward, and was soon lost to the eye of the
commander in the hazy indistinctness of distance and
night.
CHAPTER IV.
The Wrecker.
We
shall now take our readers on board the shallop,
not following her from the harbor, but letting her
proceed
on her course for the present, and go back to the
morning of the day on which she dropped down
alongside
of the sloop-of-war.
The shallop, at the time we are to visit her, lay at
anchor quite up to the city above the quay, and before
the entrance of a small inlet or dock that made in close
under the walls of an old guard-house, which was now
converted into a
pulperia
, or wine tavern, and a famed
resort for Spanish boatmen and sailors of the worst
description.
It was about nine o'clock on the morning of this
day, that a man a little above the common height, with
broad massive shoulders, and whose age might be
about fifty, came up from below the shallop's decks,
and looked around him with a quick, observing glance.
There was, to a close observer of men, distinguishable
about him an air like that of one who had once
mingled
in good society; a look of intelligence, education,
and polish, though now nearly obliterated by his
present
savage appearance and costume. His dress was
that peculiar to many of the Bahama wreckers  a
red and blue striped woollen shirt, with loose canvass
trowsers, and a sash tied about his waist instead of
suspenders. His head was surmounted by a crimson
woollen cap, with the pointed top hanging down over
the ear; and beneath it escaped masses of mingled
black and gray hair, the latter predominating. His
features were bold, yet repulsive, and decidedly
English
.
There dwelt upon his face an expression of
settled fierceness, to use this word for want of one of
closer meaning, and his mustachoed lip seemed
habitually
compressed with a look of hostile defiance. His
powerful frame and malignity of aspect made him a
man to be feared if he possessed power over his
species.
He was without weapons save a seaman's
sheath-knife
stuck in his sash.
The shallop was a small lugger, her deck flush, and
about thirty paces from stem to stern, steered by a tiller,
and rigged with fore and main-sail, with a stump mast
over the taffrail for carrying when before the wind a
square-sail, called a `driver.' She was very broad in
the beam, her width amidship being nearly half her
length. She had a hold for the stowage of cargo, and
the hatchway served both for entrance to it and for
access to the after part of the vessel, where the skipper
lodged, in a small room separated from the main hold
by a low bulk-head. There was a place in the
forward
part of the craft for her crew. She was
apparently
very old, seemed once to have been painted
black, but was now throughout of a rusty brown hue,
and her canvass was of the same dingy color. Her
rigging was much worn, and in some places was
repaired
by strips of raw hide instead of rope. Upon
the forward deck was a fire-place of bricks, in which
5
a fire was now burning and over which an Indian
half-blood, descended from the aborigines of the
islands
,
was cooking a breakfast savory of garlie.
These two were the only persons visible on board
the shallop. Her boat was absent, and probably
had taken all the crew; and for the return of this
he seemed to be watching, as his glance was directed
towards the landing-place, that was shut in by
overhanging
Spanish houses, which threatened each
moment
to fall into the sluggish water of the gloomy dock.
There was an angle in the pier, and a vessel similar to
his own lying in the range of his vision, so that he
could not see the steps of the landing from his deck.
`Hoyo!'
`Seor?' responded the half-breed.
`Throw yourself into the water and swim to the
pier, and hasten those loiterers with the boat. I would
go on shore.'
The lith Indian was about to throw off his gingham
shirt, when he was arrested by the voice of the skipper.
`Stay! they are coming.'
With a swift pull, a small canoe-shaped boat came
from the recesses of the dock and rapidly approached
the shallop. It was pulled by two men, a third being
seated in the stern. They were all Spaniards, and
were garbed much like their captain, save that one of
them instead of a woollen cap wore a broad-brimmed
palm hat, deeply shading his brows. This person was
he who sat in the stern of the boat. His age was
about twenty-four, his features handsome naturally,
but marred by that peculiar expression which vice and
crime indelibly impresses upon the countenance, even
of the most beautiful, if beauty can be without virtue
and honor.
`How is this, Vique?' demanded the skipper
sternly
,
addressing him in Spanish. `Said I not I must be
on shore at eight?'
`I had some difficulty, Captain Ingles, in finding the
agent Davila,' answered Vique, as he sprang lightly on
deck.
`And will he take all?'
`He wants all the articles, but demurs at the price.
However, he waits to see you in the pulperia of the old
guard-house, to pay you the money.'
`He shall not have an article for one marovedi less
than the price I have set upon them. Remain in the
boat, nombres, and pull me ashore. Vique, you see
that all is ready for sailing, for I shall depart in an
hour; for it is not safe to lay too long here.'
`No, Seor; it was whispered to me by more than
one buen comrada last night, after I had landed the
goods, and stored them in the place you named, and
gone into the wine-shop, that there was a strong
feeling
growing against all wreckers on account ofyou
know
what
, Capitan,' said Vique, significantly. `
Innocent
as
we
are, we may be suspected, and I am
quite willing to leave Havana over the shallop's
taffrail
as soon as you give the order.'
`These rumors are idle, for nothing positive can be
known touching us,' answered the skipper, with
disdain
;
`still, as we shall get through our affairs as soon
as I have adjusted this matter with Seor Davila, have
all ready to start as soon as I come on board.'
Thus speaking, `Ingles,' as he was called by Vique,
entered the boat and was pulled in the direction of the
sunken stairway. On reaching it he stepped on land
and said,
`Leave not the boat nor your oars until my return.
Lay the boat's head towards the shallop, and be ready
to pull back to her at a moment's notice.'
He then ascended the steps between black slimy
walls of stone, and passing through an arch at the top,
where once had been placed a gate, the hinges of
which only remained, he found himself in one of the
narrowest and most obscure streets of Havana. Ranges
of dingy tenements, of stone or brick, stuccoed and
grown mouldy with time and moisture, stood on either
hand, and occupied chiefly as wine-shops,
gambling-rooms
,
with a cock-pit at intervals of every dozen
doors. Opposite to the arch rose, black and sombre,
the strong walls of a prison, with only a single window
upon the street, but this full thirty feet in height, and
strongly grated from the pavement to the roof. It
looked into a vast common hall, in which he could see
full a hundred prisoners assembled, and from which
came sounds almost infernal. The tall window was
also filled with prisoners, from the bottom to the top,
standing on the cross-bars of iron, one over the other,
gazing into the street, talking with their acquaintances,
begging money from the passers by, or scattering oaths
and vulgar witticisms upon every one going along.
As Ingles came into this street he drew his cap over
his eyes, so that the hanging top would droop over and
conceal his features, and, without noticing the calls to
him for money that proceeded from the prison window,
he passed along rapidly till he came to about the ninth
door from the arch, where he entered, glad to escape
more than one voice, hailing familiar recognition of
him from the
carcel
.
The place he entered was a Spanish tavern,
containing
a bar at one extremity lined with shelves of
wine-bottles, and around the walls many little tables
for the guests. There were but three persons in the
room, and two of these were men-of-war's men; the
third individual was seated at a table in a retired nook,
as if to escape observation. Ingles, on entering, looked
keenly round. His eye fell on this man, who was a
short, fat little Spaniard, in a soiled red-velvet
waistcoat
,
a remarkably long queue, and very dirty ruffles
at his wrists and bosom. He had a pair of iron
spectacles
upon the table by his side, and also a cup of
wine before him, with a piece of bread and a garlic
half eaten.
`Seor Davila, good morning,' said Ingles,
approaching
him; and, taking a seat directly opposite to
him, he bent upon him his large gray eyes for an
instant
,
and then added, `Vique tells me you like the
goods but decline the full payment!'
`The goods are good goods, Seor Ingles, and are
precisely what I can turn to profit in my shop on the
Plaza; but if I pay you the twelve hundred dollars
aggregate you demand, I can make no profit at all.'
`We have traded before and had no words, Davila,
and I desire none now. Those goods cost me much!
They cost men
their lives!
Their price has been
blood, and I swear to you,
por Dios!
that I will
not abate the tenth part of a peso! I know the value
of the goods, and that you can pay this and yet
continue
to enrich yourself as you have done.'
5*
The Spanish merchant looked in the face of the
wrecker for an instant and then answered,
`Be it so! I will pay the price, though it is very
dear, Seor Ingles.'
The skipper made no reply, save by an impatient
movement of his mustachoed lip. Davila slowly took
from his pocket a large leathern purse, and laying it
before him upon the table, untied it and poured forth
the contents, which were Spanish ounces and
half-ounces
.
He then slowly counted out one thousand
dollars, and thrust it over towards the wrecker.
`There, Seor Capitan, there is gold for thy goods.'
`It is not enough!'
`There is one hundred pesos more.'
`It is not the sum I demand. Trifle not with me
and make this delay. I must not dally here.'
`Thou art a hard dealer, Seor,' answered Davila,
thrusting him the remainder. `There is thy price.'
`And thou hast the goods in store below. Adios,
Seor,' and the wrecker rose to go.
`Take wine with me, Seor. I always close a
bargain
with good wine, and this is a rare wine, which I
ordered expressly for thee and me! a glass will refresh
thee, and make thee cheerful; for, by our lady, you
always look gloomy enough!'
The wrecker frowned, but letting the curtain fall
again before the alcove, he reseated himself at the
table and extended his glass, which the merchant filled.
Ingles was about to lift it to his lips, when the door
opened and a young American midshipman and two
sailors entered. The midshipman was Harry.
One of the two men-of-war's men, who were
drinking
at the farther extremity of the pulperia, seated in a
darkened box, looked out between their curtains, on
hearing the door open, and immediately uttered a
warning
cry to his companion, and both together rushed
from their table, leaped over the bar and darted through
a door in the room. Harry was about to follow the
deserters with his men, when the Spanish pulperero,
who was in the bar, placed himself before the passage,
with a long glittering knife, and said, as he
brandished
it,
`No puede pasar aqui, Seor.'
Harry drew his stiletto, but immediately replaced it
in its sheath, and giving orders to his men to follow
him round to the back of the shop, he darted out of
the street door, without having discovered the two
men, the merchant and the wrecker, seated in the box
by the door.
But the latter had caught sight of Harry's features,
as he was leaving the pulperia, and on beholding them
he started with such impetuosity that the wine-bottle
was overset, while an exclamation of mingled hatred
and surprise escaped his lips. Without saying a word
in explanation to Davila, he instantly left the box and
advanced quickly to follow the youth, the recognition
of whom had produced such an extraordinary effect
upon him. But ere he opened the door, he stopped
short and turned back and approached the bar, where
stood the swarthy pulperero, replacing his knife in his
girdle.
`Pepe, do you know what ship those two seamen
deserted from, that this officer was after?' he
demanded
,
in a tone that made the merchant survey him with
surprise, and Pepe to stare a moment before he replied,
`The Augusta, Seor.'
`An American?'
`Si, Seor.'
`She lays at anchor, near the Moro?'
`Si, Seor Capitan. She dropped down there
yesterday
,
and is ready for sea, the two marineros say.
They give me, you know, two doubaloons a piece to
conceal them till she is clear of the harbor.'
`Do you know her destination?'
`I believe, a cruise to windward.'
The wrecker made no further inquiry; but after
reflecting a moment, he was abruptly leaving the
pulperia
,
when Davila cried,
`Ah, bless us, Seor Ingles, you go without your
gold, which you have left here on the table, tied up in
a handkerchief. You see I am an honest man.'
`
Very
honest, Seor,' responded Ingles, ironically;
and taking up the money he placed it in his
breast-pocket
and quitted the house. Before advancing along
the street, he looked on either hand as if in search of
the young midshipman; but not seeing him, he said,
`Well, let him go, now! If that sloop does not sail
to-night, he is
mine
, and my revenge upon those I have
hated, as other men love, shall then be complete. Had
I known all I have lately learned and now know, I
should never have let him gone as I did. But I will
make amends for this folly, by getting him once more
into my power. He is attached to this sloop, then. It
is many years since I last saw him, when I left him in
Boston, but I cannot be mistaken. The youth has the
same face that the child had. I knew, too, from my
faithful spy, that he was in some ship in the American
service. Now, how to get him into my possession?
for, without him, all I have done hitherto is but half
done, and done in vain. Were it night, and he
without
the men with him, I would seize him at any risk,
before he reached his ship.'
He walked slowly on, planning some scheme for
possessing himself of the person of the youth, whom
he had so singularly met. He knew that he would
soon return on board the sloop-of-war; and after some
deliberation, he resolved to go on board his shallop,
and send Vique, whose person was less known than
his own, to ascertain in the town when the sloop was
likely to get under weigh. Having decided on this
first step, he hurried on board his craft, desirous to
escape possible recognition by his victim; for, if
recognized
by him, he feared that an excitement might be
raised, and that his vessel would be detained. He,
therefore, resolved to keep out of the way, leaving
Vique to act.
In an hour the young emissary returned from the
coffee-house, and reported that it was thought the
sloop would not get sail until late the next day.
`Then have I time to arrange my plans,' he said,
with energy. `Vique.'
`Seor.'
`I have a service for you. Do it faithfully, and you
shall have one hundred pesos.
`Bueno!' answered the handsome but villainous
looking young Spaniard, his black eyes shining at the
proffer.
`I have a desire to get into my possession a young
midshipman, who belongs to the Augusta
sloop-of-war
.
Towards evening, I shall drop down and
anchor
nigh her, so and in such a position that the current
of the ebb tide will set from her towards me. In the
mean while, you must, in some way, manage, ere night,
to get on board the sloop in one of her boats. Once
there, you must try and get to speak to this
midshipman
aside. Tell him, privately, that if he would hear
news from one he has been long separated from, he
must manage secretly to let himself down into a boat,
which he will find under the lee counter, which will
take him on board the shallop he sees near, where he
will hear news from his sister.'
`This will hardly induce him to risk so much,
Seor.'
`Do not fear. Repeat to him the words I have
taught you, and I will answer for him, that you will
find it hard to keep him within the bounds of due
caution. Tell him this intelligence will be given
only on the pledge that he withholds his intention
from all on board. Assure him that the least attempt
to betray you, to make you tell your secret there, will
defeat forever his wishes! Now go, and be prompt
and discreet.'
`The name of this midshipman, Seor?'
`I know not what name he goes by, now.
Doubtless
he is called Henry or Harry; but of this I will
not be sure. He is about seventeen years of age,
with chestnut hair glossy and curling, brown eyes, large
and expressive, and rather handsome. It is the same
one who was on shore this morning in pursuit of two
deserters. This fact will be a sufficient guide to you.
Now, take the boat and depart.'
It was an hour past noon, and three hours after
Vique left the shallop on this expedition, that a boat's
crew came to the quay in the first cutter of a
man-of-war
.
Rogers was in command of her, but Harry was
also in the stern sheets. The crew landed and
proceeded
to load the forward part of the barge with
provisions
and parcels, that were lying upon the quay
ready. Among the crew was a young, good-looking
Spanish sailor, neatly clad, who was cheerfully
volunteering
his assistance to the men in getting the heavier
parcels on board. He spoke broken English very
amusingly, laughed, cracked jokes, and, altogether,
made himself and the old tars very merry at their
work.
`I say, my lad, how should you like to ship,' asked
Rogers; `we have lost three men to-day, and I think
you will do.'
`I will ship for good wages, Seor,' answered Vique,
who was quite a different looking person, in his neat
blue jacket, shining tarpaulin, and white duck
trowsers
,
from what he was in his broad palm hat, red
striped shirt, and green plaid gingham pants, shortened
half up to his knee and trimmed with a fringe!
`You shall have twelve pesos.'
`Bueno! I will ship, then.'
`Where is your chest?'
`It is at a caf, in Calle San Pedro.'
`Well, the boat will be ashore again before
sundown
.
Go and get your chest here, and we will then
carry you on board. He will make a good hand,
Harry.'
`Yes,' answered Carneil, `I am glad to get one to
make up for the two that escaped from me. But once
let the men get inside of these pulperias, they are
safe.'
The boat put off to the ship, leaving Vique
standing
upon the quay. His eye followed the figure of
Harry till it was lost to it. He then turned away,
satisfied
that he had discovered in him the person Ingles
alluded to; for he had not only heard him repeatedly
named by Rogers, in speaking to him, but he perfectly
answered the description; and Vique also heard him
confess he had lost two men he was in pursuit of.
As there was yet some hours to sunset, he returned to
the shallop, and reported his success thus far. He
remained on board until the anchor was weighed, and
she was under weigh to drop down towards the sloop,
when he left her by springing on board a vessel that
lay at the dock, as the skipper steered close to her, and
brushed by her for the purpose.
We have already seen the shallop take up her
position
near the Augusta. Vique hastened to the quay,
but too late. He found the cutter had just gone. He
knew it would be the last boat that day from her.
While he was hesitating what to do, a boat came to
the landing, the seamen of which he knew to belong
to the American service. He inquired of the coxswain,
who told him she was the first cutter of a
clipper-schooner
.
On learning that the schooner lay near the
sloop, he told him his story and the coxswain bade
him get into the boat, if the officer they came for was
willing. This officer, a passed midshipman, and
acting
lieutenant on board the clipper, at this moment
made his appearance, and permitted him to go in the
boat.
But on reaching the schooner, the officer told Vique
to come on board, that he was more needed there than
in the sloop, and that Rogers must find another man.
Vique silently submitted; but resolved to swim to
the sloop in the night. Suspecting this, the officer
ordered him below, for he had noticed his reluctance
at the first to get on board. He was therefore in the
schooner, when she got under weigh with Forrestal
and Harry. Ingles, finding from Harry's cry and act
that he had been recognized, and dreading the
consequences
,
had instantly got under weigh, ignorant of
Vique's situation, but leaving all, to effect his own
escape.
6
CHAPTER V.
The Island Cavern.
We
now change the scene of our story to that
region of islands and keys, known as the Bahamas.
Towards the northern extremity of this western
archipelago
are congregated several large islands, connected
by keys or chains of rocky islets, or mere sand-hills,
with here and there a single palm or cocoa tree,
growing
upon its sterile surface. The largest of this group
of superior islands is well known to navigators as
Abaco; but its more familiar appellation is `
The-Hole-in-the-Wall
,'
suggested by the singular aspect
one of its low promontories presents to the eye of the
passing voyager, being perforated with an arch, through
which the sea and vessels sailing past in the distance
are visible. The `key-stone' of this natural arch has
fallen into the deep water underneath, and now only a
wide opening or cleft meets the view. It is upon this
island we are about to lay the scenes of this chapter.
The time is three days after the departure of the
shallop and the clipper-schooner from the harbor of
Havana. The sun has not yet gone down, but lingers
in the glowing west, turning the waves of the
farspread
ocean into burnished gold. The large,
desolate
,
and almost treeless island, Abaco, lays outstretched
upon the shining sea, like some huge leviathan,
throwing
out from its southern head and sides jagged reefs,
like feelers, as if reaching forth to seize upon and
make prey of the heedless ship, that approached too
near. Upon the head of one of these wall-like
projections
,
the sun reveals a single human figure. On a
near view, it is apparent that it is a female. She is
standing looking seaward along the ship-passage to
the south and east. Her eye turns away, and rests
upon a sail that lies close under the horizon, far away
to the north. This sail and herself are the only signs
of life in all that wide region of ocean and island.
Nay, far to the south, at least nine miles, can be just
discerned a lonely white tower. It is a light-beacon
for the guidance of mariners through that perilous
passage by night; but the sight of it only makes her
own solitude more sensibly felt.
The expanse of view around the island on which
we find her is wide, and, lighted up by the gorgeous
hues of the setting sun, is beautiful even in its
desolation
.
Naked rocks, towering in solitary pinnacles, and
savage chains of reefs have their edges gilded, and
receive
a rosy light from the sky; and barren islands, and
the white, sandy keys that fill the prospect southward,
are made to smile with sunshine; while the wide
water is like a prism in the glory of its dyes. The
skies above the island are also pure and soft, and here
and there a fleecy cloud resembling a snowy plume,
or one like a scarlet mantle flung out upon the western
sky, gives new beauty and variety to the whole fair
scene of heaven, earth, and ocean.
There were within the horizon of this general view
certain objects in detail, which the eye would only
afterwards take in and particularly observe. One of
these was a wreck of a large ship, that lay in the cleft
of a black, ragged reef, that stretched south from the
cliff, on which the female was standing. The wreck
was without masts or bowsprit, and on the rocks were
strewn fragments of spars and of pipes, bales, and
boxes, broken open and rifled. Far away, a league
north, on a lonely key, was visible another object on
the strand, which the practised eye would detect to be
another wreck. There lay also, near the foot of the rocky
eminence on which she stood, the forward half of a
lugger, that had been wedged in the rocks, and over
which, in a storm, the sea must leap with a wild roar.
Placid as every thing was around her in the glory
of the evening sun, the features of the island
immediately
about where she stood were very wild. The
shoulder or hump of the island swelled away abruptly
west, gaining its highest elevation less than a mile
distant. But a few stunted shrubs grew upon its bold,
rocky surface, and the winds of the fierce tempests that
sometimes prevailed in those seas, had a full sweep to
howl around its summit. Beneath her position, sheer
down a hundred feet, was an inlet, reached, from
where she stood, by a dangerous, zigzag pass. On
all sides of it, save a narrow outlet towards the sea to
the southeast, it was shut in by cliffs, whose dark
shadows cast a gloom over its sheltered bosom. The
sides of the precipices were, in many places, excavated
into cavernous passages, in which, when the winds and
sea were high, the surges roared and reverberated with
the noise of thunder. This was the view beneath on
her left. On her right was another precipitous descent
into a circular basin, nearly shut in by isolated
fragments
,
between some of which a small vessel might
pass wing and wing. The south boundary of this
basin, which was about half a mile in width and depth,
was the curious spur or wall, in which was the
enormous
fissure denominated `The-Hole-in-the-Wall.'
It was on this long, gigantic, wall-like promontory,
and but a few paces from the verge of this chasm,
that the female was standing. The top of this natural
sea-wall was about sixty feet broad; and its length, from
the main body of the island to the fissure, was a third of
a mile. The chasm was a hundred feet broad, and the
remainder of the spur beyond it extended about a
quarter of a mile farther into the sea, terminating in an
abrupt cliff-head eighty feet above it.
After the female had taken a long and close view
of the southern horizon, her position commanding
many leagues of the ship-passage across the banks
southward, she moved forward along the top of the
sea-wall, and stood on the very verge of the chasm.
As she moved forward, a huge brown mastiff, of
that savage but sagacious breed, produced from a
union of the Newfoundland race with that of the Cuban
blood-hound, rose from the rock on which he had been
crouched near her, and walked slowly on after her.
His stature was enormous; and his aspect of sullen
ferocity, combined with his vast strength, inspired
terror. His color was a blackish brown, with the ears
jet black, and lapping like an elephant's; while the
skin of his black muzzle, with the bright red of his lip
visible turned outward, hung loosely about his jaws,
and a tusk like a boar's protruding beneath on his left
side, increased the savageness of his appearance. A
6 *
thick wiry mane covered his neck, and hair as long
dangled about his huge feet. His motions were slow,
but it was evident, from the tiger-like action of his
limbs, that he possessed great activity as well as
immense
physical power.
He came within a few feet of the female, and then
crouched again, laid his head upon his fore-paws, and
fastened his red, fiery eyes upon her, like a wolf
watching his prey. It was a dreadful look, and
jealousy watched each motion she made; but the
young girlfor she was both young, and, though
sun-browned and coarsely clad, graceful and beautiful
did not seem to regard his looks or his presence;
yet it was plain there could be no compact of
friendship
and amity between that malignant brute and the
innocent maiden his glaring glances watched so
determinately
.
She was not more than nineteen years of age. Her
eyes were a soft blue, but sad and sorrowful in their
expression, as if the sunshine of her eyes had too often
been extinguished in tears of woe. Her hair was a
dark brown hue, and, spite of the sun and air that had
darkened her cheek, was long and flowing, and worn
in wild profusion down her shoulders. Poor girl! she
needed its covering; for her shoulder was naked, and
the garment she had on was of the coarsest cloth, and
much torn, leaving one leg bare nearly to the knee.
Her feet were also bare, and one of them was lacerated
with the sharp flint-points of some of the loose rocks,
that were strewn around. Such small and symmetrical
feet were scarcely ever seen, yet they were as dark as
a gypsy's, from exposure. Her small hands, too, were
as hazel-hued as those of a little Abanaquis Indian
girl's. Her form was symmetry itself; and, but for the
brown hair, the blue eyes, and the glimpse of her
white shoulders through her rags, she might have been
taken for an Indian maid. The blue eyes looked
strangely out from her dark face, and gave a singular
style of beauty to her countenance. Their expression
was sad, as well as that of the beauteous mouth; and
the stamp of misery and bondage was impressed upon
her restrained look and air.
In her hand this beautiful savage held a little sprig,
which she had plucked from a stunted shrub,
containing
three scarlet leaves, which by some means had lost
their green hue. These she carried for their beauty of
color, for she had never seen a flower on that
reef-girted
island of rocks. She knew not that there were
roses,that the green earth was enamelled with
fragrant
flowers of a thousand dyes. If she found a stone
or a shell with pleasing colors, it was as a flower to
her. She now looked upon the three poor little red
leaves, and said, `how beautiful!' and smiled as she
looked upon them. She was happier with gazing
upon them than many a maiden is upon her crowded
conservatory or her gorgeous parterre of flowers, where
the dahlia, the moss-rose, the rhododendron and tulip
vie with each other to win her passing regards.
She stood watching the blue sea heaving through
the passage in the Wall, as the tide rose, and then
again her eyes wandered towards the southern horizon.
The expression with which she seemed to look for a
vessel was not one of hope and anxious desire, but
rather of fear; for as she saw that there was none
visible
where she sought for one, her face assumed a more
cheerful and relieved look. Her gaze was directed
seaward more in apprehension than in hope.
`He will not be here to-night,' she said, after
satisfying
herself that there was nothing in sight southwardly.
She spoke in a joyful tone and in a very melodious
voice; but her speech was in the Spanish tongue.
The sun had by this time sunk slowly below the
horizon, and the twilight was gently gathering over
the scene. She placed her hand up to shade her eyes,
and took one more look, and then began to retrace her
steps to the more elevated point a little way back, on
which we first beheld her. As she turned, the
mastiff-hound
rose and followed her with dogged perseverance,
but evidently not from attachment and affection; for
he seemed capable of neither. She passed the point
where she was first looking out, and, after continuing
about fifty yards, she came to a fissure in the top of
the cliff-wall, which extended half way across. It was
of such depth, that it looked dark on gazing into it.
She passed part way around it, when by steps, visible
only by close observation, cut into the sides, she began
to descend, with a familiar and fearless tread, into the
very bowels of the rock. It was like one of the
cavernous
wells of the East, the bottom of which is accessible
only by a flight of artificial steps. After she had
descended
for about thirty feet this narrow and irregular
path, she came to a shelf of the rock which would
contain a dozen men; and still lower down the fissure
was cleft into the heart of the promontory. At the
farther verge of this shelf, and in total darkness, was
an arched way, through which gleamed faintly a light
like that of a lamp. She passed under this inner arch,
and, stooping low, traversed a sort of gallery for about
twelve feet, each step bringing her into stronger light,
when she emerged into a vast subterraneous chamber,
in which burned the lamp, the rays of which had
penetrated nearly to the perpendicular shaft of this
natural mine; for the descent was like that into a mine,
and the passage and cavern like the excavated gallery
and chamber of a mine. There was a narrow fissure
in the side of this interior room, through which the
glowing sky in the west looked like a zigzag chain of
gold; and through a small, irregular crevice opposite,
not bigger than a hand, was a view of the sea to the
north; but both of these apertures were so small that
they afforded no light to the chamber. The lamp
which illumined it was a frigate's battle-lantern, and
stood upon a projection of the rocky wall, at a sufficient
elevation to cast its beams over the place.
The chamber was about forty feet long, fifteen in height at its highest part, and twenty five or six feet in
breadth. A cavern, very similar, farther out in the
cliff, had doubtless been undermined by the waves, and
falling into the sea left the roof arching across, till
by-and-by
that plunged also, leaving a passage that a
schooner could pass through.
This cave into which the young girl descended was
like some huge storehouse. It was filled with bales,
kegs, boxes, and such articles of lesser bulk than
hogsheads, as could be conveniently transported thither
and secreted by mere bodily strength. They were
the choice portions of the cargoes of more than one
luckless vessel; for the names of two ships were plainly
visible on the directions and labels of some of the
parcels. Besides these articles, which were neatly piled
up on one side of the cave, were rolls of canvass, sails,
cordage, light spars, and other ship apparel. Furniture
of all kinds was strewn around, and wares and utensils
for cooking. Two hammocks were swung at one
extremity
,
and a berth with gilded pannels and cornices
just as it was taken from the ship, was put up in one
corner; and near it were placed several bunks of ruder
construction.
All kinds of arms were piled in one corner, and near
the entrance stood a brass four-pounder against the
rock. The young girl crossed the uneven floor of this
underground chamber, and ascended a sort of loft
constructed
partly of upright spars and partly by the aid
of a broad shelf of the cave-side. The loft was eight
or nine feet high above the floor of the cave, and was
gained by a rope ladder, which had once served as the
rattlings of a ship's mainmast. She went lightly up
this ladder, and drew it up after her, and then, kneeling
down, folded her hands and murmured some simple
words of prayer, such as childhood lisps at a mother's
knee. She then threw herself upon a mattress that lay
close within the shelf that sustained the narrow
platform
which served her for a lodging-room, and in three
minutes she was fast asleep.
The dog had descended the sides of the shaft a few
moments after her, and now entered the cave. He
trotted along towards the loft, and laid down directly
underneath it, after first satisfying himself that she was
upon it. As he laid down he disturbed some one who
was crouched there, and an oath, uttered in strong
African gutterals, showed that the individual was a
negro.
`Get out ob dis, Jover, you' bed furder dat away!'
The dog replied only by a growl, and stretching
himself still more broadly upon the skin which served
him as a couch.
`O, well, keeps you' place, you willain. I see by
de red sunset froo de chink dat it time for me get up
and cook some supper for me and Dory; and pra'ps
massa come too. Hab you seen him sail, Jover?
You say notin', so you hab 'nt. Is you hab Dory up
dar, safe, you put yourself down here for watch? You
growl, dat am yes. What for she go sleep widout her
supper? Lately, she dont eat notin'; I spec' she
sorry massa no come back sooner.' Here the African
chuckled with a sort of malicious glee, and then
twisting
himself over and over, rolled his body out from
beneath the loft into the middle of the cave. He then
placed himself upright with a spring, not upon his feet,
for he had neither feet nor legs; but looked precisely
like one of those Chinese pear-shaped figures of human
beings, heavier at one end than the other, made to
vibrate like a pendulum. This African was just such
a looking monster, only he had arms, which served
him by their great length instead of legs. In height
he was not more than two feet and a half, and quite
as broad as he was high. His head was enormously
large, and the features possessed the most hideous
flexibility of muscle, so that his countenance was
capable of every possible diabolical expression; yet
his face was not destitute of a certain look of humor
and easy good-nature, which is a peculiar characteristic
of the negro race; nevertheless, it was clear, that, aroused
to anger, his passions would be quite as savage as the
brute ferocity of Jover, between whom and himself
there appeared to exist a sort of growling good
understanding
.
The negro wore upon his huge head a
turban formed of a gay bandana handkerchief, very
much the worse for the wearing, and his trunk was
covered with a sack or frock of red woollen flannel.
After righting himself and looking at the oil in the
lantern, by which he ascertained the time that elapsed
while he slept, he placed a hand on the ground on
either side of his body, and raising himself a little,
threw himself forward full a yard; and then repeating
the manuvre, he in this manner crossed the cavern
to a box, from which he took a short pipe, which he
filled with tobacco and lighted by the lantern. He
then went to another chest that stood near a ship's
stove, and taking out a piece of junk-beef weighing
several pounds, he went to the stove, tossed it into a
large kettle filled with water, kindled a fire beneath it,
and placing himself before it, watched the process of
boiling, while he deliberately smoked his pipe. The
cavern was soon filled with smoke, both from the stove
and the pipe, but gradually found its way out through
the chinks in the sides and by passing out and up
through the shaft.
7
CHAPTER VI.
The Tower Rock.
When
the African monster had satisfied himself, by
tearing off pieces with his long fingers, that the huge
piece of salt beef in the kettle was sufficiently cooked
for his palate, he stuck a short fish-knife, that he wore
in his belt, deep into it, and drew it reeking forth.
Holding it up on the end of this knife, the savage
began to rend it with his teeth and devour it in
enormous
masses. The piece of meat was two thirds the
size of his own head, and yet, in ten minutes, he had
left nothing of it but the bone. At every few
mouth-fulls
he would stop and chuckle and growl, with his
jaws crammed, and seem to regret that he could not
devour the whole at once.
Every now and then, as he ate, he would cast a
look, between apprehension and defiance, at the dog,
who had risen from his couch and padded his way
towards him almost with the heavy tread of a lion.
The dog, however, made no other demonstrations than
to snarl and display his fangs at every fresh pull the
negro took at the meat.
`There, Jover, dar bone for you,' said the African,
casting it on the ground before him.
Jover paid no other attention than by a deep guttural
note of resentment. The negro then went to the chest
and threw him a piece of meat, which the dog caught
ere it reached the floor, and paced off to a corner of
the cave to eat his meal without interruption. The
African then lighted his pipe and went out of the cavern
by leaping forward, with his ape-like hands placed on
each side of him upon the ground, and which he used
with such skill as scarcely to miss the other limbs
which nature had denied him.
On getting into the shaft, he saw that the night had
fairly set in, and that the stars sparkled brightly in that
small space of the heavens visible from the depth at
which he was from the top of the promontory.
`Hark! de wind risin, and dat bring master home
to-night,' said the negro, listening to the low murmur
of the sea around the base of the cliff. `I hope dere
be storm to-night, coz time we catch anodder big ship;
coz de beef mos gone. Me go up and look at de
wedder.'
Thus saying, the negro began to draw his body up
the broken sides of the perpendicular descent, by
fastening
his strong fingers into the crevices, and in this
way, in about three minutes, reached the top; though
the least slip of his grasp would have sent him back
to the shelf from which he started, like a heavy stone,
and perhaps rebounding from the shelf, which led into
the cavern, he would have plunged down the
fathomless
darkness of the depths far below. But habit had
rendered him insensible to the danger, as well as the
young girl, whom we have seen descend the same
perilous path, with a light and fearless step.
On looking around him, the Ethiopian saw quite a
different aspect of the sky and ocean, from that which
the young female had beheld. The golden clouds,
that hung about the sun, as he went down, were now
of an inky blackness, and were rapidly rising from the
southwest, and expanding over the sky, though over
his head all was yet clear and sparkling. The sea was
moaning, and restlessly throwing itself against the
shores, and a wind was already agitating its dark
bosom.
Far to the east a single light, like a star on the
horizon
,
told him a vessel was in that direction. It was
the ship seen by the young girl in the northeastern
bound, and now steering southwardly to take the great
channel between the ranges of islands. To the south,
a bright light, three leagues distant, gleamed across
the water, flinging its beams cheerfully abroad, as a
beacon to the trustful mariner, who, with full
confidence
in its guiding and warning ray, steers fearlessly
onward in the darkest night his adventurous bark.
The African, after looking all round the horizon,
with a slow and observing gaze, settled his eyes upon
this beacon with an air of surprise.
`Ah, dere you show you lantern agen! Now, if
massa Paul do n't put you out, if he here, den I know
notin! You know massa Paul 'way, and so you light
up widout him leave! coz I know he nebber tell you
light up when storm comin'; coz den am my time!
You see he no kill you when he know dis!' added the
negro, clenching his hand and speaking the menace
with a savage vindictiveness, that would have been
ludicrous, had it not been so devilish. `Dar a cloud
comin up flyin like a black gull, and dere a ship
comin
on de bank for pass de channel. Now dat light
dere, how I catch him, and if catch ship, when
massa
Paul gone, I get good deal gold and red cloth, and
beads and long knife, and beef, and hide it way, and
nebber massa Paul know what Lobo do! Ah, dere
dey put em out, and guess dey better. I guess dey
see dat cloud comin now, and know dat time to put
em out!'
The light had, indeed, suddenly vanished, and the
African, after waiting a few moments, to see if it would
reappear, said,
`Now I mus have my business done, afore dis storm
come on; coz I see by de way de waves begin to
chafe on de rocks, it blow a reglar white gale, and de
sea moanin, coz it no like to be wake up! Dory! ho!
Dory!' he shouted down the shaft, in a shrill voice,
that sounded more like the shriek of a cormorin than
human. `Come, hurry you up with your lantern, for
there is a storm risin!'
`O, shall I never, never escape from this fearful
bondage,' said the young girl, rising hastily from her
rude bed and descending to the floor of the cave. `I
was dreaming of my happy, happy home, and it
sometimes
seems that what I think I remember of the past
is all a dream, and that I have never been otherwise
than I am! Yet I
do
feel within me the spirit of
another, and O, what a different state, that once in
childhood was mine, and this it is that sustains and
elevates me above the degradation to which I am
doomed!'
`Dory, you lazy wretch, come up!' shouted the
Ethiopian down the cave, in an angry tone.
`Yes, Lobo, yes! I am lighting the dark lantern,
she answered, taking a small lantern with slides to
7*
conceal and protect the light  for there was no glass
in it  and lighting it at the stove.
`Oh, that I could find some way of escape from this
monster, and from the no less horrible guardianship of
this fierce dog, who, faithful to the trust his cruel
master
has imposed on him, has already left his food to
follow me, to see that I escape not! Poor chance
has one so desolate as I am to escape; with no boat to
convey me; no place to fly to, where I should not be
pursued! Even the passengers and crews of the
vessels
that were wrecked by
him
, lest they should have
discovered this cavern, were hurried from the Island
by him and his wreckers in their luggers to Nassau!
and here I remained a prisoner closely watched by
Jover, while, doubtless, no one thought this lofty rock
was accessible, or contained a living being! for, save
those who know the path up its sides, it seems a sheer
wall down to the sea!
Coming, Lobo, coming!
I
cannot
long remain here! Each month, each hour, my
slavery is becoming more intolerable,' she said, with a
kindling eye and in a spirited tone.
Taking the lantern, she took her way out of the
cave, and in a few minutes stood upon the top of the
cliff.
`You are a long while coming; take care, or I'll
give you blows with my stick!' said the monster,
savagely
,
and brandishing a short cudgel, that had once
been a belaying-pin of some hapless vessel. `Oh, ho,
Jover! you had to be done you supper quick! Good
for you, coz you no satisfy wid de bone. Spose I
want brute dog lib of de same meat me eat? Me
man! me eat beef! You no man! you no bus'ness
eat what Lobo eat! Ah, I know you come, soon I
call Dory bring de lantern; coz you know if you let
Dory get way, you hab take it when massa Paul
come, wors an you did when she teal boat and get off
a mile afore you swim out and catch de boat in you
teeth and tow um shore. If you no swim out and
tow um shore, when she get way dat time, massa Paul
hab cot you brack head orf, Jover, and you knows dat
wery well! So you bes keep sharp eye on her; coz
Lobo no foller bout and go widout debble leg where
Dory go, when she take it in her head to run! Come,
now, down the cliff to the water,' he said to the young
girl, `for we must have our work done afore it too
dark, and dis storm come on and catch us!'
She obeyed him, by going to the verge of the cliff,
on the western side, and opening her lantern to throw
light upon the spot, stooped down, and, taking hold of
a projection of the rock, began to descend the face of
the cliff by a path that had been formed by a portion
of the upper part splitting off perpendicularly and
falling
over into the sea. The zigzag course of the break,
which extended from the top to the bottom, was
generally
about a foot broad, but in some parts not three
inches, and very steep.
Opposite this cliff was another of less height, and
between the two was a basin, into which this perilous
descent led. The basin was dark in shadow, and the
gloomy dash of the unseen surges echoing among the
cavernous sides of the base came fearfully to the ear.
Having found the first step of her path the young girl
closed her lantern and hung it by a hook in her girdle,
which was a seaman's rude leathern belt, and went
down with a step so free that it was truly appalling to
witness; for it seemed that the least error in placing
her foot would precipitate her into the gulf below. But
she had been too familiar with the path as well as
with that down the shaft, to hesitate. The whole
descent
was about ninety feet by the path, the cliff being
about seventy.
After she had got about twelve feet down, the dog
followed, creeping cautiously close to the wall of the
rock, but stepping surely. Then the African
committed
himself to the path by his hands, by swinging his
body over the verge and hanging on the edge of the
descending path; and in this way, by passing one
hand over the other, he followed them with astonishing
celerity.
At the foot of this dangerous passage was a large
fragment of the rock which had fallen from above, ten
feet broad and four or five out of the water, which all
around it was of great depth; for it stood full a
hundred
yards from the main shore of the island. Upon
this rock the young girl stepped, and opening her
lantern
looked on the inner side of it, where lay a small
boat completely hidden by an overhanging part of the
cliff-side.
The dog and Lobo landed by her side, and the latter
taking hold of a chain that secured the boat to a bolt
in the rock, drew it towards them. He then took a
key from a long pouch which he wore tied round his
neck, and which held a little of every thing, and
unlocked
a massive padlock that secured the chain to the
rock. He then threw himself into the boat, which was
a small old skiff, and taking up two oars that lay in
the bottom, placed them in the row-locks. The young
girl got in and stood up in the stern, for there was no
seat, and the dog leaped in and crouched silently in
the bows.
The African then bent to his oars, rowing without a
thwart to set upon, for he needed none, being just the
height of a person seated, by reason of his strange
deformity
.
The little boat shot rapidly out of the basin,
the surface of which already swelled with a heavy
moaning noise, which in that region often betokens a
gale. The scene around them, with the tall black cliffs
on either hand, the high `back' of the island astern and
near, before them the murky expanse of ocean, broken
here and there in the foreground by the faint outline of
a large rock, or the stronger defined range of a reef;
while overhead swept past broken masses of bluish
clouds, which had been detached by the upper currents
of wind from the vast columns that were marching
from the west across the field of the zenith.
The boat kept along under the cliff, which, as we
have said, extended nearly half a mile seaward, and as
they glided along past that portion of it within which
the cave was excavated, the momentary glimmer
through a crevice of the light of the battle-lantern
within the cavern was detected by the African, who
had his eyes, as he pulled, elevated to a sufficient
height to catch it. It was, however, but an instant
glimpse he obtained of it, and to the eye of a stranger
it would have been taken for an electric gleam flitting
across his own vision, rather than for a light shining
out of what seemed a solid wall of rock.
The boat kept along the cliff until it came to the
opening so well known as `The-Hole-in-the-Wall,' and
which we have already described as an arched fissure
shaped by the sea working into the cliff till it forced a
deep passage through it, capable of admitting small
vessels. Here it changed its course and shot through
the passage, the overhanging fragments of the broken
arch seventy feet above their heads threatening to
come thundering down upon them each instant. Lobo
pulled with a strong stroke through the fearful passage,
for `the tide-current' had begun to set through it with
considerable force against him. Having got through
and on the northern and eastern face of the cliff he
pulled seaward again parallel with it; rowing fast,
for the storm was coming up with great rapidity, and
he was fearful he should be unable to get back to his
cavern and his beef before it would burst upon them.
As he got farther out from the island, though still
with the cliff close at hand on his left, there was
visible
a dark line extending quite across the field of view
as seen from the low position in which they were.
This was a reef; one of those long lines or chains
of rocks, off against the promontory already
described
,
and which, commencing near the cliff, at a
quarter of a mile distant, stretched away for a league
in a southerly direction, and towards the ship
channel. At high water the reef was covered for the
outermost two miles of it, the other shoreward mile
showing only here and there above water a sharp
point. At low tide, the whole reef was visible from
one extremity to the other. Ships steering
southwardly
after making Abaco usually passed, at the time we
write of, within a mile or two of the end of this reef;
though now since new surveys have been made, and
other and better channels discovered, their course, after
making Abaco and across the banks, is altered. South
of Abaco nine or ten miles, a beacon had been placed
by the British, for the express object of defining this
reef, so that a ship could lay her course safely by night
and it was understood by mariners that vessels making
Abaco at dark and bringing this light to bear W. S. W.
half W. could run safely through the intricacies of the
channel entrance and so render it unnecessary to come
to anchor, as many vessels formerly did when the
nights were dark; for there was a current that always
set steadily towards the reef. The portions of this reef
which lay near the cliff were composed of high
insulated
rocks, some of them fifty feet in altitude, rearing
themselves like a ruined tower from the sea. To one
of these large tower-like rocks, the negro directed his
boat, leaving the cliff directly behind him, and pulling
with great strength until the boat struck its side. It
was not more than a quarter of a mile from the head
of the cliff they had left, and stood, so to speak, on the
extreme right of the league-long reef that extended its
rocky line far away to the verge of the channel. The
description is made thus particular that the subsequent
details of the scenes enacted here may be clearly
comprehended
.
Having made a landing upon this rock, the African
began to ascend it with wonderful celerity, followed
by the girl, the mastiff remaining in the bows of the
boat, for he seemed to understand that his vigilance
was on such a spot quite as effective if he remained in
the boat; besides, the face of the rock was not furnished
by nature with such means of ascent and descent as
were the cliff and shaft; and it is doubtful if he had
reached the top if he had made the trial.
On getting near the summit of this columnar rock,
Lobo reached, on the seaward side, a small cavity
with the top of the rock overhanging it, not unlike the
top of a chaise. It was an irregular, but perfectly
sheltered opening, looking towards the east; and six
men could have found shelter in it from a storm
driving
from the west. The floor of this shelter had been
smoothed evidently by labor, and some projections, that
extended too far over it from the top had been broken
off. In the shape of this cavity there was nothing
remarkable
,
as a hundred other similar excavations
yawned in the cliffs and hollowed the rocks of that
region
.
The use to which it had been and was now to
be put, was the most wonderful.
Lobo, on gaining this spot, removed a canvass
covering
which had once lain over a vessel's hatchway,
and exposed in the back of the cavity a large iron
hoop, suspended against the rear of this hollow place
in the side of the top of the tower-rock. Upon the
hoop were hung on wire hooks thirty-six small glass
lamps, filled with the purest oil, and all neatly
trimmed
.
This hoop of lamps was the size of the largest
hogshead hoop. Behind it, made visible by the light
of the lantern which the young girl opened, was a
reflector
composed of more than a thousand fragments
of mirror irregularly put together, but covering a
surface
of the diameter of the hoop of lamps. In a word,
it was a simple but most efficiently constructed
light-house
beacon! In a box underneath it were scissors,
wicks, and a bottle of turpentine, to make them ignite
easily, and with which Lobo began to touch each wick
by means of a feather; and in the crevice of the rock
were large demijohns of oil.
`We must be speedy and return, Dory,' said Lobo,
as he touched the last wick; `now light up and let us
go, for the sea is growing dark, and we shall be caught
in the storm.'
The young girl with a sigh, and covering her face
with her hand as if doing that, which made her
tremble
,
but which fear compelled her to do, touched
the light to the circle of lamps, and as they were all
connected by a thread dipped in turpentine passing
from one to the other, the whole circlet was instantly
in a blaze, and a light dazzling as the sun caused them
to turn away their faces and descend; while far over
the sea eastward this false `Light of the Reef' sent its
infernal glare, to lure the trustful and confiding mariner
to shipwreck and death.
8
CHAPTER VII.
The Wrecker's Lugger.
Leaving
the two inhabitants of the cavern hurrying
towards it in their little boat, after the light had been
kindled upon the summit of the Tower-Rock, we shall
now change the scene to the deck of the shallop, two
hours later. By this time the tempest had burst upon
the sea and islands in its strength, whitening the wild
surface of the waters as if snow were drifting over
them. The shallop was about twelve miles to the
south of the island and laying to, for the wind was too
high and the waves too terrific to run. The seas made
a breach over her as she lay, but being light she rode
them with buoyancy, though each moment threatened
to be engulfed.
At the helm stood Ingles. It was lashed, but
nevertheless
he stood by it from habit, his grasp upon the
head of the carved tiller. It was a fearful sight. The
howl of the wind through the skies, and its terrific
roar, as it lifted the black waters and bore them upon
its wings, would have appalled one less accustomed to
such scenes. The wrecker stood grasping the helm
with one hand and holding to the bulwarks of his little
vessel with the other, and with a stern composure
waited the passage of the hurricane. His men were
forward clinging to the stays of the fore-mast, on which
was spread the close-reefed fore-sail, which kept them
to the wind. The only light thrown upon this fearful
scene was from the phosphorescent glare of the foaming
waves that heaved and tumbled and broke in shining
masses around them. Darkness was upon the face of
the deep, and the elements seemed rushing back into
original chaos.
The eye of the wrecker was often directed from the
care of his vessel to windward, as if looking earnestly
for some object. Then an expression of defiance would
pass across his features, which shone white and
ghostlike
as they caught the baleful glare from the
phosphorescent
sea; he would murmur some words
indistinctly
,
and then give his attention in-board to his vessel,
the momentary expression passing away and changing
to one of seaman-like anxiety for the shallop's safety.
`See to the fore-sheet, that it is well belayed!' he
suddenly cried, in a voice above the tempest. `The
sail labors hard, and if any thing gives way we do n't
see `The-Hole-in-the-Wall' again, any of us! The
storm has n't yet got all her pipes in her teeth!'
`All safe, sir,' answered one of the men in Spanish,
for the wrecker had used this tongue, though with a
slight accent, that indicated it was not native to him.
`Do you know where we are now, Capitan?'
`About three and a half or four leagues from the
Island. But since this storm came up I cannot tell
where we are, exactly. We must lay to till it blows
over us. The boat rides well, and has need to; for
this is a gale that a larger and better craft might go
down under.'
`Where do you think the schooner is by this time?'
`At the bottom of the channel, I hope!' answered the
wrecker, with emphasis. `They can't be so well
acquainted
with these waters as I am, and yet we have
been nearly lost to-night till we hove her to. Rocks
and reefs around her, and not twenty feet under her
keel, she stands a fair chance of faring as I hope she
may!'
`It was a hard chase we have had, sir,' said the
Spaniard
,
who had taken Vique's office in the craft; `and if it
had not been for this gale we might have had warm work
of it. When it came on she was within three miles of
us.' And the man, as he finished speaking, came aft,
pulling himself along the decks by the aid of the
bulwarks; for the deck was as steep as a roof, and
each moment a cataract from a broken wave poured
over her from taffrail to bowsprit.
`There is no doubt we should have been overhauled,
Publo, but before they should have come alongside
they should have sunk the shallop with their shot!'
The words of the wrecker, as he spoke, were not more
expressive of determination than his countenance.
`Do you think they have any idea
who
we are,
Capitan?'
`They know very well. They have one on board
them, or else are sent by one who knows that
I
am in
the shallop. But let him heed himself. If I ride out
this storm safely, there may yet be power in my hands
for evil, as there has been.'
`What do you mean, Capitan?' asked the Spaniard,
wonderingly.
`It matters not what I mean! attend to the shallop.
Look out up the rigging for the light! With this tide
and wind we must be drifting fast.'
The man threw himself into the rigging, and, clinging
to it with his hands and feet, had ascended but a little
way before a wave caught him upon its crest, and
wresting him from his grasp bore him, shrieking with
despair, high over the vessel's deck, and whelming him
far to leeward in the wild vortex of the mad seas.
The wrecker gave utterance to a fearful curse, as he
saw the man borne away beyond hope of rescue. The
next wave tore the fore-sail from its booms and hoops,
and swept the deck, pouring over the vessel in a deep
cascade, a roaring waterfall of many feet, and for a
moment only the masts and the head of the skipper
and one of his men was above the surface. The
shallop
,
however, after a desperate struggle, threw off the
vast weight of water, and rose buoyant above the
surge, only to encounter another equally gigantic.
`She can't stand this, crank as she is,' said Ingles,
seriously, as he shook the salt spray from his face and
gray locks. `I have but a single man left; for this
last sea has taken that lubberly Pedro!'
`What shall we do, Capitan?' cried the sole
remaining
man, creeping aft and clinging with fear to the tiller.'
`Die, if we must!' he answered, with savage gloom.
`But thou mayst follow after thy companions, and
perish; but I shall not die! O, no! I have too much
unfinished work yet in the world. It is not to be my
fate to die now! By and by, but not now!'
`We are sure to be lost, Capitan!'
`No, Juan, no! I fear not. If thou wouldst live,
cling closely, and bind thy body to the main-mast.'
`No, no! if the shallop should founder!'
`Then take what care you can of yourself.'
`Where are we now?'
8
`Ask the wind or the waves! I know not. Dost
thou not know that the waves have long since put out
the binnacle light, and my compass is no better than a
piece of white paper? I know not south from north,
save that I guess it from the course of the wind. But
I am content,' he added, with an exulting laugh; `I
am content, Juan, so that the infernal schooner has
the same!'
`And do you think she fares as bad as we have?'
`She will be at the bottom before dawn to-morrow,
if this gale blows on in this way.'
`And so shall we, Jesu Maria!'
`No; keep thy tears and prayers! I tell thee
I
shall
not die!'
`Then I will cling to thee, Capitan;' cried the man,
terrified by the fate of his shipmates, and the roar of
the tempest, which seemed each instant to increase in
fury; and, as if catching a sort of hope from the
reckless
words of the wrecker, he embraced his knee, and
clung to him with the energy of a man who would
strive to resist fate.
`Ah, poor Juan, you will die, too, in spite of your
fears and clinging grasp,' he said, smiling at the man's
terror. `We are now driving, God knows where!
before the tornado; for now our fore-sail is blown out
of its hoops we have nothing to steady her by, and
must let her drive! When the gale first struck us we
were then running in the windward gap, to creep to
windward of the schooner, for I knew she would
hardly risk following us in, without a pilot, which she
can't have on board, I think. We were about five
leagues from Abaco then, and running N. N. E. We
ran about a league in the gale before we lay to, and
we have been laying to more than an hour and a half.'
`And all this time we have been drifting!'
`Yes; both with wind and tide. It is my opinion
we are not many miles off from the Island!'
`O, Seor, that we were there! There is a high
wave rolling along astern after us! It will destroy us!'
`Hist thy noise, hombre! 'T is worse than the wail
of the storm. Do you not see how the shallop rises
upon it, as it stoops under the stern and lifts her up as
you would lift an infant, and tosses her onward!'
`We shall soon drive on the rocks, and then there
will be no escape!'
`I can do nothing! The hurricane holds us in its fist,
and we must await our destiny. Didst thou feel, Juan,
the joy I feel, to know that the schooner is in peril as
well as we, and that perchance there is one on board
of her who will perish with her, if she perish, as
surely she will this night, unless that boy carries a
charmed life, as I think he must, for many is the
death,' added Ingles, muttering to himself, `that I
have laid in his path, and yet he lives.'
`Who is it, Capitan, you speak of?'
`Get to thy feet, man, and look this way with me!'
cried the wrecker, suddenly. `What is it thou seest?
Is it not a vessel, almost within call?'
`It is a spectre ship, Seor! The Holy Mother save
us now, for our death is sure.'
`Fool! 't is the glare of the sea that throws this
strange light upon her! It is a vessel, and it is
the
schooner!
But she is to leeward. It must be another
vessel!'
`I see her, but I cannot see how many masts she has.
The schooner should be to windward.'
`My eyes are not blind! Dark as it is, I see plainly
she is a schooner. She may have carried sail longer
than we did and so over-run us. She is now laying
to, and as dead ahead as she can lie, and not a cable's
length off!'
`We shall go into her, Capitan!'
`No! your knife, quick, to cut the lashings of the
tiller, for I can steer her clear, if the devil help me!'
A schooner was now seen but a little distance ahead,
lying to under a close-reefed fore-sail and jib.
Although
the skies and sea around the low horizon
were pitchy black, yet the outlines of near objects were
visible by the light of the breaking waves, as we have
before observed; a light peculiar to the sea in low
latitudes, of a most extraordinary nature, and of which
no description will convey any adequate idea. It
must be seen. Instead of light it is the
ghost
of it!
It was by its unearthly glare that the schooner was
apparent to their vision.
The shallop, driven before the wind, upon the top of
the waves, without an inch of canvass, was bearing
down directly upon the schooner's beam. The
wrecker
had cut the lashings of the hitherto neglected helm,
and taken it in his grasp. With an eye fixed upon the
schooner, he coolly undertook to save his vessel from
instant destruction. If he could have sunk the schooner
at the same time with his own craft, he would
doubtless
have let her run aboard, head on, as she was
driving
;
but the weight of the shallop was not sufficient to
insure certain destruction, and less than that he was
not the man likely to attempt.
The shallop was now seen on board the schooner,
and instantly the voices of alarm and warning reached
the wrecker's ears, as he stood in the stern of his little
vessel, guiding her with all his skill and strength,
aided
in the latter by Juan. He smiled, as he heard the
confusion.
`Now starboard a little, Juan.'
`Starboard, seor!'
`Steady, Juan!'
`Steady!'
`Starboard
hard!
' he shouted, in a voice that rung
on the winds; and they threw themselves bodily upon
the tiller to press it hard up to the windward.
`Starboard for your life!' called out Forrestal, from
the deck of the schooner through his trumpet, and
echoing his cry were heard a score of voices
throughout
the vessel.
The next moment the shallop shot by upon a huge
wave directly under the bows of the schooner, the
bowsprit of the latter catching each of her masts, one
after the other, and sweeping them from her deck as
she flew by, scarce checking her in her fearful speed.
At the same moment, Ingles, swept off by the masts,
found himself in the sea, clinging to the davit of his
vessel with one hand, his other arm hanging broken at
his side. With a vast effort, he raised himself to his
deck, the dismasted vessel still driving on like an arrow
upon the waves and winds. On looking around he
found himself alone. Poor Juan had perished. He
smiled with a feeling of stern, almost savage
exultation
,
as he realized that he was the only one who had
survived the tempest and the wreck; and he felt as if
he could believe in the truth of his own recklessly
uttered words, that, as
yet
, his destiny on earth was not
sealed!
Behind him was the schooner, fading spectre-like, in
the mists of the night, and on the storm was borne
to his ears loud words in fierce denunciations, that he
answered with a loud laugh, that mingled strangely
with the shrieking of the gale.
The shallop had hove in sight, borne down upon,
and plunged under the schooner's bows all so in a
moment, that Forrestal saw her flying dismasted to
leeward, with her commander standing alone upon her
deck, before he could realize the whole that passed.
He had run forward, after echoing the wrecker's own
order to put his helm hard up, but only to see him dash
by, leaving ruin behind; for the bowsprit, which had
swept the lugger's mast by the board, broke off short
at the foot, and fell into the sea amid the ruin it had
caused. The schooner lost her power with the loss of
the jib, to lay to so well, and began instantly to roll
and pitch as if she would pitch her long slender masts
out of her, for they bent with the elasticity of steel rods
at every plunge of her bows under.
Forrestal stood a moment upon the windlass,
supporting
himself by his hand on the bitt, looking after
the shallop, which was not in sight to his eyes a
minute
and a half after she had gone past. Suddenly, he
felt a hand upon his arm.
`Well, Harry!'
`It was the shallop! I saw him! for I had hold of
the foot of the jib when she went by. I saw him! You
will not let him escape!' were the earnest words of
Carneil, amid the confused and angry cries of the men.
`Yes, it was some wreckers, Harry; but it may not
have been the chase. It was too dark to distinguish
any one.'
`No, no! not to distinguish
him!
Besides, I heard
his voice! Listen! I hear it now!'
`It is the laugh of a demon! I will have him,
Harry
,
if it be our man, as I suspected when I saw him
coming down, though I expected he would have been
ahead.'
`Shall I give the order to make sail?'
`Yes, Harry, for we cant well lay to without our jib.
Let her drive! He has no canvass, and we will not be
long behind him. I know pretty well where we are,
and that the channel is free ahead. All hands to
unloose
the main-sail and set her close-reefed, and ease
off the fore brace. We must let the schooner take it
wing and wing and drive!'
The orders were obeyed with alacrity; for the
shallop
had for the last two days given the schooner a great
deal of trouble, by dodging and running among keys,
and taking advantage of other means of escaping,
rendered efficient by the perfect knowledge Ingles had
of the Bahama Banks, over which the chase had been
followed. The crew were, therefore, glad of any
chance of getting him into their power.
The schooner now went bowling along over the
huge white-capped waves with appalling velocity; and
as she was hurled onward from sea to sea, she rolled
in every shell of the billows, so that her top-sail yard
dipped at every swing of her masts to this side and
that, and the sea was almost constantly waist deep
in-board
.
`If she goes bodily under at every swoop, Harry, I
promise you I will stand on so long as a spar holds,
or she can swim!'
`Thank you, Mr. Forrestal,' answered Harry, who
stood by his side on the quarter-deck, both keeping
their feet by holding to the binnacle,  for no man
could stand upon deck unsustained. The bows were
under water constantly, and the men had all been
called
aft as far as the capstan, for the forecastle was
swimming. `Thanks, for your kindness, good
Forrestal
,'
continued Harry, insensible of the great
danger
around him, in his anxiety to capture the shallop;
and Forrestal, for love of him, and almost as deeply
interested as himself in getting the man into his
power
,
looking upon the storm only in the light of a
more welcome means of putting the wrecker into his
hands.
`He cant be far ahead now, Harry! We must go
twice as fast as he does, scudding with our sails, and
he without a spar. The only fear I have is, that he
may go to the bottom!'
`Oh, no, I hope not! If he is lost to-night, all is
lost! Heaven preserve him!'
`Amen! this is praying in earnest for our enemies,
Harry! Keep him from drowning, that he may be
hanged, is my prayer! Keep a sharp look there about
the gangways. We can see ahead without being on
the bows, now we have no bowsprit, Harry. See! it
is breaking in this direction! It is to the northwest. It
blows yet as hard as ever, but we shall have an end of
this before midnight. What do you see?'
`I thought I saw the shallop, but it was only a black
wave lifting itself ahead.'
`The billows are growing longer and higher, and
that is a sign we are shoaling our water. Heave the
lead!' he shouted. `You need not go forward with it
into the fore-chains, or you will be washed overboard!
besides, you cant stand it. Heave at the gangway,
with plenty of slack!'
`Seven fathom!' answered the man, in a quick tone
of surprise and alarm.
`Sound again!'
`Six fathom!'
At this moment, a ground-swell billow, twenty feet
in height, and of inky blackness, with an edge of
bluish
light, came majestically swelling after them.
Seeing
its approach, Forrestal called out,
`Harry, hold on to me! Every man throw himself
flat upon the deck!'
The mountainous wave, with a velocity that
outstripped
that of the winged vessel, hung an instant
above the stern, like a beetling cliff, and then tumbled
with a sliding motion in upon the quarter-deck, and
rolled roaring towards the bows. A second and then
a third followed it, and the vessel, for full a minute,
lay dead under the burden; but rolling, she emptied
her decks of most of it and recovered herself from the
shock, and went driving onward again, as before.
Forrestal
sprung to his feet, and Harry with him, to behold
a scene of ruin. The binnacle, with their only
compass
,
and the man at the wheel, had been swept
overboard
,
and a dozen of his crew, out of fifty men, were
9
struggling in the surges far astern. The
companion-way
,
the caboose, and every thing not a part of the
firm hull, had been swept over, and three of the guns
had broke from their lashings and were driving from
one side of the deck to the other, at every roll of the
vessel. Forrestal had hardly time to contemplate the
wreck, or lament the poor fellows lost, ere Harry, who
had but one thought and one object for his eyes, cried
out, in thrilling tones,
`The lugger! the lugger, Forrestal!'
`Where?' he cried with animation, forgetting all
else.
`Dead ahead!'
`I see, and I will ride right over her and sink her!'
`No!
He
must be saved!' cried Harry.
`True! Then I will lay along and leap on board!
How is the lead?' he asked, anxiously, `for we may
be ashore in three minutes!'
`Eight and a half!'
`We are safe awhile, then!' he answered with
energy
.
`I will take the helm now myself, for your man
shall be ours, Harry!'
CHAPTER VIII.
The Fate of the Shallop.
The
wrecker, from his deck, saw the schooner
reappear
from the darkness astern, in about a quarter of
an hour after he had passed her with such damage to
his little vessel; and with one arm clinging around the
stump of his main-mast, and the other thrust into his
bosom, he stood with his face towards her, sternly
watching her approach.
`They come upon me fast! They will soon be
aboard of the shallop, and it will be a grave in the
deep sea, or chains,' he said within himself. `I will
not die yet. What proof have they, that I am the
wrecker that kindles the false beacon on the reefs?
No man knows it, that dare betray me! So, I fear
them not. But what these now seek me for, is not a
matter of beacons and shipwrecks. That boy's tale
has despatched the schooner, for I clearly saw him
with my glass on her decks yesterday, when she came
so near as to fire a shot over me. Then I should have
been taken, but for an opening in the keys into which
I run, and so got through to the channel beyond, while
they had two leagues round to go. Ah, I have led
them a brave chase, the three days since I sailed from
my anchorage under the Moro. And well it was I did
sail, for I should have been prevented, I see, from the
prompt manner this schooner has been sent against
me. Bravely they come on, and in five minutes they
will be up with me! They mean to run over me!'
he suddenly exclaimed, with a quick alarm, that
showed
the instinctive love of life was true to itself. `No!
they are putting the helm up! I will suffer them to
take me, for I shall deny all knowledge of the boy.
His word can be no proof for my detention, after she
gets back to port; and no man of them can
identify
me as the displayer of the beacon. They are upon
me! I must yield or sink! Ho! the schooner!' he
shouted, in a tone loud and imperious,do you mean
to go over me?'
`No, but I mean to sink your shallop,' answered
Forrestal, who had changed his original intention,
knowing the man would save himself. `As the bows
of the schooner touch you  for I can't pass you,
having
no command of my vessel in such a sea  cling to
the anchor-fluke and throw yourself on board!'
There was no time to deliberate. The schooner was
right upon him. The masts and sails towered above
his head, and the next wave would hurl her over his
little vessel, whose deck was now nearly level with the
surface of the sea
`Now is your time,' shouted Forrestal, in a tone
heard above the noise of the waves; and the same
instant
the sharp bows of the schooner struck the
larboard
quarter of the lugger about a fathom forward of
her taffrail, and pressed her, or rather crushed her with
the blow and weight instantly out of sight! The
wrecker, with an oath at the loss of his vessel, and at
being compelled to throw himself into the hands of
his foes, caught at the fluke of the anchor, and saved
9*
himself from being swallowed up in the wild vortex
which had engulfed the shallop. He then threw
himself over the bulwarks of the schooner, and, half
swimming, half wading through the seas that broke
over the bows on their striking the shallop, he made his
way aft, and confronted Forrestal, who had hung a
battle-lantern on one of the belaying-pins under the
main shrouds. The light of the lantern fell full upon
the wrecker. He was bare-headed, and his grey thick
hair was dripping with brine. His brawny neck and
chest were naked, and he was clad only in a Spanish
shirt and pantaloons. His large stature and muscular
frame were in strong relief, and the haughty defying
expression
of his strongly marked features was imposing.
With his bared arms folded across his herculean breast,
he stood, as if disdaining any support, during the
irregular
rolling of the vessel, surveying Forrestal, and
Forrestal surveying him, for full half a minute in
silence. Close by Forrestal's side stood the light,
elegant
figure of Harry Carneil, his eyes also closely
reading
the features of the wrecker.
`So, then, is this your welcome,' said Ingles, with a
sneer, and a disdainful movement of his head; `am I
a wild beast, that you and your men stand and gaze
on me thus. God help you! I hope you will know
me again, and especially that younker with the button!
You have run down my vessel, and I expect you to
give me hospitality on your own!'
`You shall have it, to your heart's content,' answered
Forrestal with a cool smile.
Harry had started, and all the blood in his heart
leaped to his brain, when the wrecker alluded to him.
For an instant he could not speak. He was about to
reply in an indignant tone and boldly denounce him,
when Forrestal said, in an under tone,
`It is your man, Harry, is it not?'
`Yes, and I '
`Not now. Time enough. This is no time nor
place. He is ours, and we will sift him soon as this
gale is out! Keep quiet, and compose yourself, and
be thankful for our success! I need n't have asked
you, to be sure, if he was the right fellow, for he could
be nobody else than precisely your villain! Come,
sir,' added Forrestal, turning to his prisoner, `you will
please, for the present, regard yourself as my
prisoner
!'
`By what authority?' haughtily demanded Ingles.
`That I will explain by and by, when we can hear
each other speak better. The irons, gunner?'
`They are here, sir!'
`Put them on him!'
`Do you bind a shipwrecked man  wrecked by
your own vessel?' he demanded, stepping back.
`You need not think to deceive me. You are the
skipper of the shallop that I have been in chase of up
the keys for two days past. You are the wrecker who
lay at anchor under the Moro Castle three nights ago!
If I find on examination to-morrow I have wronged
you, I will make reparation. Will you submit quietly
to be manacled?'
`This is a dangerous ground your schooner is
driving
over! Each moment, I warn you, you are in
danger of shipwreck!'
`I know it, and I mean to come to anchor now I
have caught you, sir! I have risked the lives of every
man on board, as well as the vessel, to get you in my
power, for I should have come to anchor after losing
my jib, but for the pleasure of this meeting! Clear
away the anchor. Spring lively, men, for it is time
now to look to ourselves. Cast the lead, one of you.
Look out forward that none of you get caught by a
sea and carried overboard in its arms. Luff a little
and lay her to the wind, helmsman, close as you can,
and check her head as much as you can in safety to
the men that are clearing away the anchors. It won't
be safe to let her drive this way.'
`Quarter-less-six!' sang out the man in the
fore-rigging
,
for there was too much sea yet for him to stand
in the chains, though the gale was evidently lessening
in its force, and the waves broke seldom and less
violently
over her stern; while forward she kept her
forecastle
clearer of seas than she had done ten minutes
before.
`I submit,' answered the wrecker, sullenly, `but if I
must be chained, and your vessel is wrecked, my life
be on your hands.'
`I will be responsible, Seor,' answered Forrestal,
firmly.
`Five and a half!' cried the man heaving the lead.
`You see it shoals. We are driving ashore!'
`More need to have you secure. Gunner, do your
duty. Hurry there with the anchor.'
`I will see to the men and the anchor, dear Forrestal,
if you will only have him chained,' cried Carneil.
`That I will do. Forward, and call out when all is
ready. We are driving to destruction, and have been;
but I have done it to secure this fellow.'
Ingles sullenly suffered the gunner, aided by the
boatswain, to fasten the manacles upon his wrists.
`Now pass that slack of the topsail halyards twice
round his waist,' said Forrestal, `and secure him firmly
with a double turn to the capstan. If he gets free from
that he will have to pull the capstan up from the deck;
and, bull-necked as he is, he won't quite do that.'
The wrecker was chained and bound as Forrestal
had commanded, the key of his hand-cuffs being taken
by Harry himself, with a feeling of peculiar
satisfaction
.
Forrestal now gave all his attention to the safety
of the schooner. In a few moments the anchor was
ready. Men were stationed at the halyards of the fore
and main sails, and two placed at the wheel.
`Hard-a-lee!' shouted Forrestal, from the starboard
main-rigging, into which he had got, better to command
the schooner.
The bows came round with a leap, as it were,
dashing
the spray high into the air.
`Halyards all!' shouted the commander, and the
fore and main sails came down, leaving the schooner
without a stitch of canvass.
`Now let go the anchor,' cried Forrestal, his voice
heard clear and distinct above the raging elements.
The noise of the plunge of the anchor was lost in
the louder dash of the waves. The twenty fathom of
cable was brought up tight in an instant, and the
schooner was checked with a shock as if she had
struck a rock.
`That liked to have knocked her masts out of her,'
said Rogers, who we forgot to say accompanied
Forrestal
and Harry to the schooner from the sloop-of-war;
and acted as second in command,
next
to Carneil.
`She drags her anchor, sir!' shouted Harry, from
the windlass.
`What water have we?'
`A quarter-less-five.'
`That is not bad for the Banks. I am more afraid
now of deepening our soundings, for then I should
know we were near an island. Does she drift much,
leadsman?'
`About four knots.'
`That is better than driving twelve. Clear away
the other anchor. The best bower is n't enough.'
A second anchor was just ready to be dropped, when
Carneil reported that the best bower had parted.
Forrestal had no need to be told, for the portion
in-board
flew back, striking the hollow deck with the
report
of a four pounder; while the vessel began to toss
about like a chip in a whirlpool. The other anchor
was dropped as soon as the schooner could be brought
head-to again, and her way deadened; but this did not
hold her so but that she drifted four knots, each moment
shoaling her water.
The clouds, in the mean while, were growing lighter,
not only in the west, but overhead, and there was
every sign that the gale would speedily abate.
`So long as I do n't get much more nor much less
than six fathom, I am safe, Harry. How does the
cable hold?'
`Well.'
`See that it does n't chafe in the hawse-hole.'
`It is well served with matting and canvass. There
is not so much strain as there was, sir, on the other.
The sea is falling. It was a plunge head-foremost,
and then the short lift again, that parted the best
bower.'
`I hope we shall ride it out; for I do n't know where
we are. The lead gives black and white grains I see,
but this is the same for a hundred miles of latitude on
the Banks, at precisely the same depth of water. I
only know we are in the channel, but whereabouts,
north or south of Abaco, I can't say. One of you
go aloft and see if you see any thing of the English
light on the key head. It is ten miles south of `
The-Hole-in-the-Wall
,'
and we should see it if we are in its
neighborhood, as it is now clearing in the horizon.'
`I will go up and see,' answered Rogers. `But this
is the region of the false beacon, that all the captains
who have been wrecked swear they were misled by,
though nobody has ever been able to find a trace of
one by the day.'
The wrecker's face wore a peculiar smile of
exultation
and contempt as this remark fell upon his ear.
But he remained silent, though his lips moved slightly,
as if he would have spoken something. The
movement
of the muscles of his lips was, however, quite as
expressive as words.
`What do you see?' called Forrestal to his acting
lieutenant, after he had got up in the rigging two thirds
of the way to the top-sail-yard.
`The waves run so high that by daylight we
could n't see more than two miles. I discover
nothing
.'
`She drifts so, sir,' cried Harry, from forward, `that I
fear she has slipped her anchor. There does n't seem
to be any strain on the cable.'
`Give a turn to the windlass and see. I should not
wonder if we had lost it; she has been pulling at it
ever since it caught itself on the bottom, like a horse
trying to snap his bridle.'
`The cable comes in freely, sir! we are drifting!'
`Then we must take our chance, for there is no
knowing where we are. Keep a good look out, Mr.
Rogers, for the light. The clouds are breaking and
opening fast, and we will soon find out where the
schooner is. There is a star already twinkling through
a gap in the storm. All hands to make sail. Man
the halyards there forward and let us set the reefed
fore-sail again. Spring aft here some of you to the
main halyards. We must try and carry sail now we
have no anchors to hold on by.'
`Light ho!' called out the young officer cheerily
from the cross-trees, in which he stood swinging to and
fro with the roll of the schooner, in fearful arcs of full
forty feet sweep from side to side.
`Where away?' shouted Forrestal in a joyous tone.
`In this direction,' he answered, pointing over the
larboard quarter. `I can't tell how it bears, as we have
no compass, sir.'
`The gale blows from the south and west,' said
Forrestal, thoughtfully; `we must be driving now
towards
the north and east. The light bears then about
W. S. W. We are in the channel, there is no doubt
of that, and have been bowling straight through it all
along, or we should have been brought up by some of
these islands or keys long since. There is no other
light in this region than the English light, and this
must be it, for I calculated we could not be far from
its neighborhood. I will go aloft and see for myself.
I see it now,' he said to Rogers, after he had got up a
dozen ratlins; `it is the English light. I know now
where we are. Now if we had a bowsprit we could
soon run up and make a harbor, for there is good
anchorage there.'
`The gale has nearly blown itself out, sir,' said Harry
to him as he came down upon deck. `Shall I see to
fitting a spar for a temporary bowsprit? We can
rig one in an hour, and in another hour bend another
jib.'
`You are born for a sailor, Harry. I was about to
give you orders to do this very thing.'
Harry sprung forward, involuntarily shrinking with
a gesture and glance of fear as he passed the wrecker,
who stood silent and gloomy with his manacled arms
crossed upon his breast, and listening with an air of
scorn, and at times with a derisive smile on his lip, at
the conversation of the officers. Forrestal went below
to examine his chart. He unrolled it before him upon
the table, and soon ascertained exactly where he would
be likely to be, the light bearing in a certain quarter.
`I am,' he mused, revolving his calculations in his
mind, `I am about six miles south of
The-Hole-in-the-Wall
,
and about five distant from that light, and this will
make the schooner
here
,' he said, making a point with
his compasses nearly half way between `
The-Hole-in-the-Wall'
and the English light. `Here is my
position
,
and I am going this course to the N. N. E. at the
10
rate of nine knot under my reefed fore-sail and
main-sail
!
This is my place on the chart, if the gale has not
veered and still blows as it did when it began, from
the south.'
`It has abated enough, sir,' called Rogers from the
companion-way, `to shake a reef out of both sails.'
`Then make more sail and set the fore-top-sail close
reefed.'
`Ay, ay, sir.'
`The wind, I think, still holds where it did, for
the waves roll with a regular onward swell, which
they would not do if the wind had chopped. Besides,
I see no varying of the mercury in the thermometer,
which any change of the wind to a point more
northerly
would affect instantly. So I will make my course
accordingly for the light.'
`The new bow-sprit is in hand, Mr. Forrestal,' said
Harry, coming into the cabin, `and it will soon be run
out. I have every spare hand at work either hewing,
rigging in stays for the jib, getting ready to bend on
the jib, or reeving halyards. In less than half an hour
we shall have the sail set.'
`You have done well, Harry. There is our
position
,'
and he placed the point of his dividers in the
place he had before marked. `The light bears so! the
wind comes from about S. by W. and we are
here
.
I shall go about as soon as I can carry the jib, and
try to make the light for a harbor.'
`The sea is going down and we shall soon have a
clear sky and less wind.'
`I hope so. Your man on deck, Harry, looks as if
he would like to have us all go to the bottom together.'
`I shudder, even to pass him! All he made me
suffer when a boy rushes upon my memory, and I
tremble
as I did then. But I will conquer this.'
`You are sure it is the man?' asked Forrestal,
looking in his face earnestly.
`Yes; I cannot be mistaken.'
`Has he noticed you? Does he seem to recognize
you at all?'
`No; he has noticed me only by the remark you
heard him make.'
`It was a singular remark to be made to you, if he
is the man and did not know who you were. I am
glad you are so positive, for in binding him I have
taken a great responsibility; for he might have been
only a poor wrecker. Half of them you know look
like bucaneers, so this man's looks are not evidence
enough against him.'
`I can tell you how you can be convinced. I
remember
that the man who tore me and my sister
Isidore from our home had lost his small toe from the
right foot. I used often to see him wash his feet in
the cabin when I was in his power, and this
circumstance
made a strong impression upon me.'
`This, then, will be evidence enough. What has
he on his feet?'
`Spanish boots of untanned skin,' answered Harry,
going up the companion-way and looking at the
prisoner
,
who stood where the light of the battle-lantern
could expose every movement.
`This matter shall be decided at once.'
`I do n't need any such proof; for I am positive,
Mr. Forrestal. He avoids my eye. I am glad he is
bound.'
`I have bound him lest he should do you a harm,
for he cannot escape unless we are shipwrecked. Sir
Spaniard,' said Forrestal, who did not wish him to
suspect his purpose, `I know it is the custom of your
countrymen to conceal knives in your sleeves, girdles,
and even your boots. I wish to deprive you of any
such means of doing mischief. You will suffer the
boatswain to search you.'
He made no reply, but smiled scornfully, and
unfolding
his arms, permitted the boatswain to examine
his sash, and then his sleeves.
`Now his boots!' said Forrestal, with deep interest
in this part of the proceeding.
The left boot was removed and held up and shaken
by the earnest and thorough-searching sailor; but no
knife fell from it.
`Now the other!'
The wrecker put out this foot with the same air of
defiance and derision he had offered the other. He
seemed to feel a pleasure in disappointing them; for he
could have no suspicion of a deeper motive than that
which had been given for the removal of his boots.
He could not even have any idea of the use that might
be made of any discovery that should be made of a
physical defect.
`There is nothing here, sir,' said the boatswain.
At the same instant Forrestal felt Harry nervously
pressing upon his arm. `Very well, help him put on
his boots again,' answered Forrestal to the boatswain.
`I am sorry to trouble you, Seor, but I wish to be
secure.'
`
You saw it
, Mr. Forrestal!' exclaimed Harry,
drawing him down into the cabin.
`Yes; and now all my doubts are removed. That
man shall stick to me and I to him till all you wish to
know is known.'
10*
CHAPTER IX.
The Beacon Light.
The
singular discovery made by Forrestal with
which the last chapter concluded, removed at once
every doubt that might before have existed as to the
identity of the man they had so wonderfully got into
their power, with the person who had taken away
Isidore. Harry had no need of this confirmation.
The recognition from the first had been unhesitating
and without a doubt in his mind.
`Now that you are convinced, my dear Mr.
Forrestal
,'
said Harry, earnestly, his cheek glowing with
his zealous solicitude, `let there be no delay in
bringing
him into the cabin and making him answer truly,
with his life at your feet, where my sister is. I would
have asked him at once to his face, had you not
checked
and bade me wait. I have waited.'
`There is now no opportunity to question him as I
wish to, dear Harry,' said his friend, smiling. `He is safe
enough for the present. As soon as you get the
bow-sprit
rigged and the jib on, I will tack ship and lay
her course for the light. I am afraid to run much
longer in this direction; and if I can weather the light
there is a snug harbor there that I can lay in, with the
schooner against the rock, as at a pier. There we
must lay until I can send some wrecker to Nassau for
anchors and a compass; or till the sloop-of-war arrives
on the Banks.'
`The light is out of sight, sir,' called Rogers.
`Yes, we are drifting away from it every moment.
Go, Harry, and drive the men to get on with their work
forward as fast as possible. Keep her to the wind,
helmsnan! Let her hug it as close as she can!'
`Ay, ay, sir! she lays to pretty well now.'
In half an hour more the bowsprit was rigged, jib
set, and the gale having lessened to a steady nine-knot
breeze from the south, the schooner bore up and laid
her course for the light, which was just visible from
mast-head, glimmering on the horizon like a planet
setting in the west.
`She lays her course very well, Mr. Forrestal,' said
Rogers, who stood by him on the deck; only she
throws the spray forward so heavily that no man can
stay on the forecastle.'
`The light opens fast and bright upon us,' answered
Forrestal. `It is now about a league and a half.
What soundings have we here? Heave the lead. If
we have eight and a half, I know I am right in my
calculations as to our whereabouts. The star
Aldebaran
I caught a glimpse of through the drift a
moment
ago, and I knew from that my bearings pretty
accurately. I am running right.'
`No bottom!' called out the leadsman from the lee
rigging.
`No bottom! How much line did you throw?'
`Fifteen fathom, sir.'
`This is strange. Run out thirty.'
Forrestal walked forward and stood anxiously
waiting
the result.
`No-bor-or-or-to-o-o-m,' sung the man, in the
sonorous
sing-song strain peculiar to leadsmen.
`This is surprising! We must be on soundings!
That must be the English light!' cried Forrestal.
`Wrecker,' he said, turning to his silent prisoner, `you
must know these waters. Is that the English light?'
`If an American naval officer does n't know his
duty, he must not expect to learn it from a poor
wrecker
,'
answered the man, derisively.
`Confound the villain!' said Forrestal to himself,
`if I do n't humble your haughty bearing, my fine
fellow
,
ere you and I part!'
`Mr. Forrestal,' said Harry, `you can't be too
careful
.
You know this is the part of the Banks on which
false beacons were displayed! This may be one!
and there is an expression of exulting malignity in
that man's face, since he answered you, that leads me
to fear this may be a false light you are running for.'
`I begin to mistrust, since I find I am not on
soundings
.
On the chart I should have eight fathoms all
along here.'
`Deep water!' sang the leadsman.
`Have you bottom?'
`Yes, sir, at twenty fathom.'
`Throw again; this is better.'
`Sixteen fathom!'
`That is better still! we were out farther than I
thought, and are now running in to the regular bank
soundings.'
`Thirteen fathom!'
`I am right! we are correct. It is the English light,
if the next heave give us less water.'
`Nine and a half!'
From nine and a half to eight it continued for
nearly ten minutes, when the soundings became so
regular that Forrestal's doubts were removed.
Moreover
he was confirmed by a sneering remark made by
the wrecker.
You had best be cautious how you run for that
light so boldly, master; for I see you fear false
beacons
.
Now I think it more than probable that is one;
so if you take my advice you will run farther to the
south.'
`This man's words decide my course,' said
Forrestal
to his young officers. `I know well that this is
the neighborhood of the false lights that the captains
of the two ships say misled them; though the Spanish
cruiser that went to find them returned, saying there
was no signs of any.'
Forrestal felt a slight touch, and catching Harry's
eye, was directed by its glance to the face of the
wrecker
.
Its expression was one of singular exultation.
`This man is a very devil. I do n't know what to
make of him,' said Forrestal to his friend. `But I will
bring him up with a round turn, soon as I get the
schooner in safety.'
The light now opened so round and clear, being
about two and a half miles distant, that Forrestal was
satisfied it was the English light, which he had often
seen.
`No wreckers could show a light like that,' he said.
`We are right. Keep a good look-out there forward
for land!'
`Ay, ay, sir!'
`Rogers, take your place forward, and keep watch.
We are running in now very freely. The lead speaks
correctly, and I think we are safe in running. It is
impossible this should be a false light, for then
where
is the English light? We must see two lights, if we
see
one!
'
`That is true,' answered Rogers.
`We shall have a heavy rain out of that black cloud
upon us soon, that will hide it,' said Forrestal. `We
have had the wind, and now we are to have a shower.'
As he spoke, a flash of lightning, followed by
thunder
,
came from a rain-cloud that had risen in the west
after the heaviest of the storm had blown over. It
rapidly obscured the few stars, and came upon them
with that rapid advance so common in that latitude.
In five minutes the rain poured upon the deck in a
deluge, while the sea, beaten down by its force,
seemed
almost without a billow. The light was faintly
seen, for a moment, and then was lost in the dense
atmosphere of water.
`Do you mean to stand on in this course long?'
asked the wrecker, suddenly.
`Yes. I know where I am. Why do you ask?'
`Because that light, I assure you, is a false one!' he
answered, earnestly. `If you wish to save your vessel,
you must alter your course several points farther south.'
`I shall do, be assured, just the opposite of what
you say,' answered Forrestal. `Your object is to
mislead
me. The rain is lessening,keep her as she is.
Can you see the light ahead there?'
`No, sir.'
`Keep a bright look-out, Harry! We must run close
under it, and leave it a quarter of a mile on the
starboard
bow, says the chart, and when we get it abeam,
steer west northwest, one half north, and that will bring
us into the haven behind it.'
The schooner continued to stand on. The wrecker
appeared very uneasy, and several times ejaculated as
if he would speak. He was constantly looking out
ahead with anxiety.
`You fear, if I run in here, that I shall find men who
know you and can bear testimony to some villanies of
yours on the Banks,' said Forrestal, observing him.
`Light, ho!' shouted several voices.
The schooner, advancing obliquely in one direction
and the shower in another, suddenly passed out of it,
and the light blazed forth not two cables length
distant
on the lee bow!
`Put about, sir, or we are lost!' shouted the wrecker,
bounding as if he would break from his confinement.
`I hear the roar of breakers!' cried Rogers.
`And I see a dark reef dead ahead!' responded
Forrestal. `Ready about! Hard down your helm!
Luff!
Luff!
right up into the wind's eye! There is
no time nor room to put her away!' cried Forrestal,
his voice elevated to its highest pitch.
The danger of the schooner was instantly apparent;
for the light from the `Tower Rock,' which blazed
above them, shed its glare over the angry waters which
all around them were lashed into foam by the repelling
rocks over which they were breaking. Dark as the
night was, Forrestal could see a wall of reef-rocks
stretching away to the right and left, and the light
which had lured him on to the danger, now served only
to show him the fearful trap in which he had been
taken.
`I told you of your peril,' cried the wrecker. `Now,
loose me! Would you have me perish here, bound
like a dog?'
But he was unheard. Forrestal had sprung to the
aid of the helmsman, and every man was exerting
himself to get the schooner out of the danger. She
obeyed her helm and luffed into the wind with all
shivering; but she had got such head-way, and the
seas set so strongly upon the reef, that, before she
could wear and take the wind on the larboard tack,
she was lifted upon a large billow and dashed, beam
on, upon the jagged rocks that rose above the surface
on all sides of them. She struck with such force, as
the wave passed from under her, that her masts went
by the board, shivering upon the sharp rocks as they
fell. Another wave bore the bull farther on, and letting
her fall heavily upon a cleft in the reef, there she
became
firmly wedged in. The next billow leaped over
her with a wild roar that drowned the cries of the
mariners, who were seeking safety by every means
within their reach.
`Be cool, men,' cried Forrestal, `and try to reach the
rocks over the stern, between the coming of the seas.
Harry, you stand by me. Rogers, see that the men
do not throw themselves over rashly, to be dashed to
pieces! Now, men, is your time!'
By great exertions, nearly all the sailors reached the
rocks above the surges. The light which had led them
on to ruin blazing brilliantly down upon the scene of
death and devastation. At intervals from the shore,
and as it seemed on the summit of a tall cliff that hung
over them a cable's length off, came to their ears a wild
savage shout of triumph. It seemed as if a demon
was exulting over the ruin below him.
`Now, for our safety, Harry! Wait till the next wave
passes over us. Lay close to the deck, when you see
it coming!'
`But the man! Hear him call upon us and curse
us!'
`I mean to free him as soon as the next sea clears
us, and give him his chance with us!'
`If he is lost, all my hopes '
Harry's words were broken off by Forrestal's pulling
him flat upon the deck. The wrecker, who had been
struggling to free himself, and calling for aid, crouched
behind the capstan, to let it swoop over him. Its force
and weight broke the hull near the main-mast, leaving
him on the more forward part, alone! Forrestal and
Harry were irresistibly borne upon the surge from the
deck and lodged together upon a rock, to which they
clung. Aided by Rogers, and the men who had
already got ashore, they were lifted from this place,
from which the next wave would have washed them,
to a shelf on which they stood above its reach.
The first thought Forrestal had, was of the wrecker.
The man was seen by the glare of the beacon, still
bound to the capstan, and each moment the part of the
wreck he was on was sinking lower and lower, as it
slid from the rock. His cries were more like those of
a wild beast, than human! He writhed and struggled
11
and plunged with mad but impotent efforts to free
himself.
`He will perish! I should have released him before,
but the schooner struck so suddenly, it was out of my
power!' said Forrestal, with pity and grief. `I care
not so much for the villain's life, but for you, Harry!
Yet, I would not like a man should perish, bound,
whoever he is, without giving him a chance for his
life. Nor shall he perish!'
With a generous impulse, Forrestal made a spring
to reach the wreck, when the gunner caught him and
held him back with a strong arm.
`It will be death, Captain Forrestal!'
He had hardly spoken before there was a general
cry from Rogers and the men, and Harry Carneil
the next moment was seen swimming amid the
surges.
`Harry!' cried Forrestal, with horror; and but for
Rogers and the others, he would have plunged after
him. Two seamen, however, did so at the risk of their
lives. One was driven back by the waves, but the
other, diving, as did Harry, let it pass over. The next
moment the daring boy was by the side of the man
whom he most feared and hated on earth, but whose
life he would rather save than any man's living,  not
excepting, perhaps, even Forrestal's!
`
You
come to save me, boy!' cried the man, looking
upon him with a singular expression of ferocity.
`Yes. You shall not die yet!' answered Harry,
casting off the strong rope that bound the man to the
capstan, and which he had stranded in his superhuman
efforts to liberate himself. The bonds were loosened
and the man stood free, save his manacles, which gave
his hands about twenty inches play,  this being the
length of the chain connecting the hand-cuffs.
`Now, your hand-cuffs!' said the determined boy,
taking the key from his pocket to unlock them. While
he was doing it, the light of the Tower was suddenly
extinguished.
`One word, now,' said the wrecker, flinging his
chains into the surf. `Do you know who I am?' The
wrecker spoke in English, with his mouth close to his
ear.
`Yes, villain!'
`And you have pursued me to take me, because you
recognize me!'
`Yes!'
`Then know, before you die, for die you shall, if I
have to drown myself to drown you, that your sister
lives, and is in my power!'
As he spoke, he caught him up and sprung over the
stern with him into the boiling surge. The sudden
extinction of the light, after the prey had been taken,
to prevent the discovery of its position, prevented
Forrestal
from seeing what was done, though he was also
on the wreck again, having risked his life to save that
of Harry. But as he reached the capstan, he heard
Harry's wild shriek ring above the roar of the billows,
as the monster plunged with him into the mad waters.
Forgetful of all else but his young friend's safety, and
divining, from his knowledge of the facts of Harry's
life, and of the character of the man, that he was
attempting his destruction, he did not hesitate to leap
after them. It was pitchy dark, but he heard near
him, in the water, a gurgling cry and swam in that
direction with all his force. The next moment he felt
his foot strike something beneath him, which yielded.
He dove and buried his hand in the wiry hair of the
wrecker. Another grasp lower down and he held him
by the throat. The wrecker, who had sunk beneath
the surface to keep his victim under water till he should
drown him, knowing, from his experience in
swimming
,
that he would outlast him in breath, at once
rose to the top of the water, but releasing his hold of
Harry and thrusting him far beneath him. He then
grappled with Forrestal. The latter, however, held his
advantage of having him by the throat, and, although
the wrecker clung to his waist and sunk with him, he did
not release his hold. Suddenly, he found Harry's hand
pass across his face and his grasp upon his arm. To
save him, he instantly released the wrecker's throat,
dashed his fist into his face, and, catching Carneil in
his arm, rose to the surface with him, and after an
arduous struggle, gained, first the wreck, and then the
rocks.
`Has he drowned, sir?' were Harry's first words, after
being able to articulate, which was not for five minutes
after the men had got him and Forrestal beyond the
reach of the waves.
`God knows! I hope so, the incarnate demon!'
answered
Forrestal, who was chafing his young friend's
temples and hands with the tenderness of a brother.
`O, no,
no!
He must not perish! Save him, dear
Forrestal! All depends on him! All is lost if he die!'
`It cant be helped, Harry. He may have got to the
reef, but it is so dark here we can see nothing. If he
is saved, we can secure him.
`O, I hope so! I hope he is saved! He told me
my sister lives, and is in his power!
`Did he say this?'
`Yes. After I had released him, he asked me if I
knew him. I told him, yes. He asked if I had
pursued
him because I recognized him. I said, I had. He
then said, in the most savage manner, `that he would
let me know, before I died, that my sister lived, and
was in his power. He then caught me up and said
I should drown, if he had to drown with me!'
`The man is a fiend! This is wonderful, you tell
me! His revenge against you is wonderful! Never
was a person involved in such mysteries as seem
thrown around you! I do hope the man has got to
the rocks safely! But our shipwreck, Rogers! This
is a most singular affair!'
`That light was not the English light.'
`It was the prince of darkness, holding out a lantern
to lead us on, rather. I now believe that there is a
false light
, and that we have been running for it. And
the fact that it has been put out, so soon as it was
discovered
a vessel had come ashore!'
`If it is a false light, it is on Abaco Point, just where
the captain said, and we are ten miles north of the
English light. One thing is certain,  we are
wrecked
on a long reef, as we can tell by the roar to the right
of us, running south of the light we were steering for,
and such a reef is no where near the English light;
but there is such a one stretching off south of `
The-Hole-in-the-Wall
,'
on Abaco Island; and on that reef we
11*
are, I am very well convinced. But now we are here,
I dont leave the Island till I know all about this beacon
affair. If it is to be found, and those who kindle it
are to be found, they wont escape us. If I could sift
this matter to the bottom, and catch these monsters,
who thus murder seamen by wholesale, I would not
regret the loss of the schooner.'
`What time does the moon rise?' asked Rogers.
`At about an hour after midnight. By feeling the
hands of my watch, that goes still, with all its wetting,
I find that it is now just twelve; for they are both close
together at the handle. We will wait here quietly till
we get the light of the moon, and then move to better
quarters. Dont despair, Harry, we may catch your
man skulking about the rocks yet.'
`The sea is falling fast, sir,' said the boatswain; `I
think by the time the moon is up, we can get on board
the wreck and get arms as well as provisions If this
is the `Light of the Reef,' that has lured us on here
to-night, we are likely to need something to defend
ourselves against the villains, as well as help us
capture
the whole nest of 'em.'
`The fellow was right when he cautioned me about
steering for the light,' said Forrestal.
`It was to save himself, when he found we were
likely to be wrecked; as he
knew
the light he must
be of the gang,' remarked Harry.
`Hark! Hear that yell from the cliff!' cried Rogers.
`It is the same exulting cry we heard when we struck!'
Again it was repeated, and then again, with
increased
exultation,  a sound something between shrieking
and laughter. The men huddled together, appalled
with superstitious fear. And as the light had gone out
at once, leaving no sign of its ever having existed,
they began to whisper among themselves that the
devil had more to do with their shipwreck than any
wreckers; for they were quite assured that the voice
they heard was his.
The cry began to be uttered again, when it was
suddenly
checked, and ended in a yell of pain, while a
deep voice was heard, in menacing tones. Then all
was silent.
`That voice was
his!
' cried Harry, almost with a
shout. `He is saved, Forrestal, he is saved!
I felt he
would not die with that secret on his soul!
'
CHAPTER X.
The Beacon.
The
long-wished for moon at length rose, without
a cloud far to the north of east, for it was in its third
quarter. The clouds had been driven before a
northwesterly
wind, beyond the horizon of the ocean, and
it had become gradually bright star-light above them.
As soon as the moon sent her red beams across the
sea, which yet rolled its heavy billows landward, but
without that wildness which had characterized their
motion in the storm that had gone over, as soon as her
light would enable him to move with safety upon the
rocks, Forrestal ascended an elevated portion of the
reef and looked around him. At a glance, he saw that
the round swell of the Island, from which the reef shot
out, was `the back of Abaco,' and that he had been
wrecked on Abaco reef. He therefore was satisfied
that the light which had misled him was that false
`Light of the Reef,' which had been sworn to in
Havana
and Nassau, by the captains who had been
wrecked as having existence, though many questioned
it. He now looked along the jutting bastions of the
reef for something that resembled a light-house. He
could see nothing. Harry and Rogers were by his
side. Harry was looking for `his man,'  Rogers, for
the beacon! Suddenly the latter, with an exclamation
pointed Forrestal to a glittering object on the top of
the needle-like rock, a cable's length, or eight hundred
feet, to the north of them, which our readers know as
the `Tower Rock.'
`It is a reflection of the moonlight upon mica!'
said Forrestal. `No  it is globular! and see, as the
moon rises, another and another object catches its light;
and now there is a circle of bright globes shining like
a crown of silver stars in the bright glance of the
moonbeams!'
`What can it be?' exclaimed Rogers, who, with
Harry and Forrestal, had been watching its gradual
advance from a single spot to a circle of them.
`I can tell!' answered Forrestal. `The secret is
out! It is a ring of glass-lamps, hung there towards
the sea. It is the very place where the light was when
we struck, and, though they were put out, the friendly
moon has betrayed their secret covert!'
`This is true. I can count the lamps. What an
extraordinary discovery!'
`Now,' said Forrestal, `to catch the rogues!'
`And to catch
him
, also, dear Forrestal!'
`Never fear, Harry! He must be one of them, I
imagine, if not their head one! Now I will bless
the moonlight after this! But for it we should not
have discovered it, for the rock looks inaccessible and
as naked as a needle. I should have looked for a
beacon or a wood-work affair,  never for a circle of
lights hung on the face of a rock. Doubtless, it is
taken care of in the day and hid away in some of
these caves!'
`What will you do now, first, Mr. Forrestal?'
asked
Carneil.
`The wreck can now be boarded by swimming. I
will have some of the men go aboard and pass a rope
to the reef, and by means of it we will get some
boarding
pikes and cutlasses, if no pistols or powder, which
is doubtless all wet. We will then explore and try and
get a footing farther on the Island till morning.'
The stern portion of the schooner, abaft the
companion-way
,
which had hung unsupported while the rest
of the keel lay upon the reef, had broken off, as has
been narrated; but, as full three-quarters of the
schooner
lay wedged in the rocks, though surrounded by the
water, they were enabled to obtain a few cutlasses and
pikes, though into the hold of the vessel the sea
flowed
freely.
Arming his men, and placing himself in advance,
Forrestal began to move along the reef. The
moonlight
enabled them to step with safety; but as some
parts of the reef were detached from the rest, they had
to swim from rock to rock; but as the sea was now
comparatively smooth, they were enabled to get on
without the loss of any life.
Forrestal's object was to reach the base of that
columnar portion of the chain of rocks on which he
had so singularly discovered the circle of lamps
gleaming
in the moonbeams. After arduous exertions, on
the part of all, they at length got to the foot of this
rock. It rose more than forty feet into the air above
their heads. He began to examine its base, and at
length discovered that it contained fissures and
projections
that would aid one who should attempt to ascend.
He resolved to make the trial, for he knew that the
lamps  if lamps they were  could not get there
without human means. He found, as he got higher
and higher, that the facilities for ascending were
greater
,
until he could mount with celerity, as if up a flight
of stairs. These projections, which he found as he
advanced, were not apparent from below; so that, to
one at the base, the rock appeared inaccessible. This
deception had, probably, prevented other shipwrecked
men from the attempt now made by Forrestal, and
which he would not have made unless he had seen the
moon reflected from objects upon the summit, that he
believed were lamps composing a beacon.
He was followed by Harry and Rogers, whose
profession
as well as his own, had taught them how to
climb. On reaching the shelf, near the top, and
walking
round to the sea-face of the rock, Forrestal
discovered
the cavity, with its hoop of lights, its reflector, and
all the other apparatus of the spot. He uttered an
exclamation that sounded very like an oath, which
drew his two officers to the place.
For a few moments they stood gazing on the lamps
and then on each other, in silent astonishment.
`Well, this is a discovery worth the schooner,' said
Forrestal, at length. `I don't regret her. Here is the
beacon that has played me false, and others before me.
I never saw any thing quite up to this!'
`I don't wonder the Spanish gun-brig that was sent
up here didn't find any thing,' said Rogers. I never
should have supposed there was a place up here large
enough for a gull to perch on. See what a nice nook
is all hollowed out to keep all under cover. The
government
couldn't ask for a better lighthouse than this,
if it was only honestly kept.'
`We should see the real light from here,' said
Forrestal
,
looking south.
`It is invisible, though the horizon is clear in that
direction,' said Harry.
`It is very strange. Well, I shall sift this matter to
the bottom, all round. We are forty-one, in all, and
armed, after a fashion, and we can hold head against
these fellows; for there can't be more than this
number
here, if a dozen. Doubtless, they all about here
have a share in the profits of the wrecker, and have
a keeper of the light. I hope he nor none of the rest
will escape off the Island before day; for the wrecker
who got ashore will give the alarm, and let them know
they have caught a Tartar, instead of a peaceable
merchantman. The sloop-of-war will be along
to-morrow
,
if she has safely weathered the storm, for she
was to sail direct for Abaco first, and then cruise up
and down the channel. Till she heaves in sight, we
must hold together for defence. At daylight, we can
judge how it is best to act.'
After having carefully examined the ingenious
apparatus
of the false beacon, the party descended; with
more difficulty, however, than the ascent was made.
Forrestal let it remain, in order to remove it complete
by day. From the top he had discovered that the reef
on which he was, and of which the beacon-rock
formed
a part, was about fifty yards from the end of the
cliff, and that `The-Hole-in-the-Wall' was in this cliff
about a furlong farther in towards the Island. The
gap he could discern, though, from his position, he
could not see through the cliff. The sides of it
seemed
to sink perpendicularly beneath the water, and to
afford no path to reach the main even should they
reach it. He therefore resolved to remain quietly on
the reef till morning with his men; and, each one
seeking
such shelter as he could, the weary seamen soon
fell asleep on their cutlasses. Harry, also, shortly sunk
down, overcome with fatigue; but Rogers and
Forrestal
remained awake to watch; for they knew they
were upon a spot where dangerous enemies, doubtless,
had their eyes upon them.
Forrestal walked up and down a narrow space on
the reef, at quarter-deck pace, revolving in his mind
the events of the night,  till all that had occurred
passed
in calm review before his mind. He could not but
give vent again and again to his astonishment in
audible
exclamations, as he thought upon the wonderful
discovery he had made at the top of the rock, and
upon the singular instrumentality by which the
reflector
had been revealed. His thoughts then dwelt upon
the extraordinary man he had taken prisoner, and upon
his mysterious connection with Carneil; and as he
revolved the whole subject in his thoughts, he came to
the conclusion, in connection with the wrecker's
knowledge
of the beacon, that the man was one of the
piratical
beacon-wreckers who were concerned in this false
`Light of the Reef;' and that, in pursuing Harry's
villain
,
he had been pursuing, also, one of the pirates of
the Keys, against whom the schooner and sloop had
been ordered to cruise.
`If,' said he, turning to Rogers, and speaking aloud
his thoughts, `if this fellow who got ashore is one of
this Hole-in-the-Wall gang, then he must have a
dwelling somewhere on the Island; and
there
it is we
must look for that poor girl.'
`What poor girl, sir?' asked Rogers.
12
`O, ah! I forgot. You don't know Harry's story.
Well, to beguile the time, I'll relate it to you; for you
ought to know a twofold motive we have in getting
this man into our possession again.'
Taking the arm of the midshipman, Forrestal then
began to relate the story, as he walked up and down
the rock,the waves, the while, breaking at their feet,
the moonlight silvering the heaving ocean in a long,
bright path,  the dark rocks towering above them,
and the groups of men sleeping around.
`Now, Mr. Rogers,' he said, as he ended the long
recital, now you can account for poor Harry's anxiety
to save the man alive; for in his wicked breast was
locked up the secret of his sister's fate,  nay, of his
own parentage and birthplace!'
`And also, now the cause of his springing into the
harbor when he recognized the man. We thought him
crazy.'
`It is enough, this uncertainty, to make him so. Do
you know that I begin to suspect that fellow, Vique,
who escaped when we were off Double-Headed Shot
Keys, at night, belonged to these wreckers? His face
always wore, I noticed, a peculiar expression, when he
heard me speak of capturing them; and then he
boasted
their skill in avoiding cruisers, as if he knew more
of them than he cared I should guess. Now, I believe
that fellow was as bad as any of them, and got away
from the schooner because he was afraid of being
found out.'
`He would not have left her where he did, sir, if he
had not been sure of meeting friends, I think.'
`That is my opinion. List! Do you not see an
object
moving on the cliff? Stand perfectly quiet, and
direct your eye where my finger points.'
`It is a man, stooping.'
`So I thought. It is a wrecker, watching us. Let
us be quiet. We are in shadow and unseen, while
the moon reveals him. Let us observe his motions.
He is creeping low. Now he is stationary.'
In a few moments the individual disappeared, and
they saw no more of him, or any other moving
object, for at least twenty minutes, when Forrestal
detected a small boat emerge from `
The-Hole-in-the-Wall
,'
and pull towards the reef, keeping close under
the cliff. It moved with noiscless progress, but came
steadily on. As it approached, they could discern one
person in her only, who was rowing with two oars.
`That must be the man who was on the cliff. He
was watching if he could discover us; and as the men
are all sleeping in sheltered nooks, and we have a
rock between us and the moon, he has seen no one,
and is doubtless coming to destroy or preserve from
our discovery his reflector and lamps. He can have
no other motive in thus stealing along and coming so
near.'
The boat now left the cliff and began to cross the
narrow space of water between it and the reef, the
moonlight shining clearly upon it. It now pulled on
swiftly, but still with a noiseless dip of the oars.
`Whoever he is, or whatever his purpose, he is
cautious
enough,' said Rogers, in a whisper, for the boat
was within ten fathom of them. `See, how low he
crouches in the bottom!'
`He has turned his face. He is a negro. Let us
be as cautious as he, and we shall yet have him in our
power. Doubtless, he supposes we are all down by
the wreck, or else are asleep. Keep close, and be
ready to aid me, if he lands.'
The next moment, the boat touched the reef just
above where the men were sleeping, and where they
were concealed, and instead of a man, to their
astonishment
out sprung a monster! It was Lobo. He
had placed his hands upon the rock and thrown his
body out by turning a summerset and lighting upon
the stumps, that should have been legs. Acting as if
secure from observation, he then began to go over the
rocks towards the base of the beacon, throwing
himself
forward on his hands after a fashion that excited
the astonishment both of Forrestal and his companion.
`It is the devil himself,' said Rogers, with emphasis.
`Then let us take him prisoner,' answered Forrestal,
laughing. `It will be doing mankind incalculable
service. Look at him now. He is listening. You
see he is a deformed African. Now he moves again
dexterously, using his arms for legs. He is making
for the foot of the beacon-rock. His object is either
to destroy or secrete the apparatus. The fellow has
masters over him. He is not the prime mover. It
must have been this monster whose yells we heard.'
`How can he get up that rock?'
`Let us watch him. See that! He goes up hand
over hand, like a sailor up a rope. He must have the
strength of a giant in his arms to lift his body in the
air in that style. Now, come and let us take him,
before he can injure what I wish to preserve as a
curiosity
as well as a trophy.'
The two officers sprung forward, each with his
cutlass
drawn, and Forrestal reaching the foot of the rock,
called out to him. Lobo stopped mid air, and
looking
down, gave expression to his surprise and alarm
in a deep Spanish execration.
`Come down, Muchacho,' commanded Forrestal in
Spanish, `or I will come after you and cut you down
by the wrists!'
The only reply he got was something like a growl,
and the savage rapidly ascended till he reached the
top. Forrestal sprung after him, holding his cutlass
between his teeth. When he had got up ten feet, a
fragment of the rock, torn off by the negro from the
mass, came bounding down, and leaping over
Forrestal's
head within an inch of it, plunged into the sea.
Forrestal, exasperated at this attack, redoubled his
exertions, and soon stood upon the top. Lobo threw
himself over, at the same instant, into the cavity that
held the lamps. Forrestal followed him and presented
his cutlass at his throat, as he crouched in a corner of
the nook, grinding his teeth like a wolf in his lair.
`Monster, will you yield, or shall I kill you?'
`I be massa's slave, massa no kill,' answered Lobo,
covering his face at the sight of the weapon.
`Then go down, and I will follow you. Try to
escape, and the officer below will slice your huge head
from its shoulders!'
`I no try get 'way, massa,' answered the African,
who, finding escape no longer possible, had, all at
once, changed animal ferocity into slavish submission.
Lobo descended the same way he had gone up, by
the aid of his hands, and not a little to the amazement
of Harry, the boatswain, and two or three of the
seamen
,
whom the noise of the falling fragment had
awakened. Rogers, in a few words, explained how
he came there, and that he was, probably, an agent of
the pirate-wreckers.
On reaching the bottom of the tower, Forrestal said
to the slave, laying the flat of his cutlass upon his
shoulder,
`Now, Muchacho, your life depends on your
speaking
the truth. Deceive me, and you die!'
`I speak true, massa,' growled Lobo, trying to look
very virtuous and innocent,  but making, in the effort,
grimaces so diabolical that the sailors were confirmed
in their original opinion, formed when they saw him
coming down the rock, that he was the prince of evil;
and that he was without legs because he had a pair
of black wings folded up under his arms. This was
both the gunner's and boatswain's opinion, in which
they were sustained by that of nearly every one of the
men.
`What have you to do with that beacon?'
`Me fill de lamp, me burnish him, me light him, me
take car' ob him.'
`You do, do you? And who is your master?'
`Massa Capitan Ingles.'
`Is that his name  Ingles?'
`Him name, massa.'
`He put the light there, and you take care of it?'
`Yes, me and Dory.'
`Who is Dory?'
`Massa's Dory.'
`Where does this precious master of yours live?'
`I nebber tell, if you cut nigger head orf!'
`Then your head shall go off quickly; for, you
rascal
,
you confess you lighted the false beacon which
wrecked us.'
`Yah, yah! Yes, massa.'
`The black devil laughs at his mischief,' exclaimed
the gunner with a burst of indignation, in which all
the crew joined,  for by this time they were all
gathered
round Forrestal and the negro.
`You see these men. They will tear you in pieces,
if I say the word.'
`Massa Ingles kill me, if me tell. You kill me, me
no tell,' said Lobo, trembling at the angry faces around
him.
`If you will show me where the habitation is of the
man or men, or rather,
fiends
, who light this beacon,
you shall be protected, not only from your master, but
the vengeance of these shipwrecked seamen.'
`Will you swear massa Ingles no hurt me?'
`Yes. How many has he with him? Is he
captain
of the gang?'
`He hab in de cave livin wid him no more dan
Lobo, Jover, and Dory.'
`Who is Lobo?'
`Me, Lobo.'
`Who is Jover?'
`De big dog, what watch Dory.'
`And who is Dory,  a monkey, I dare say?'
`No, a woman,  a litty young woman. She got
eye blue, like de sky.
`Be patient, dear Harry! There is nothing here yet
to raise hope. His master may not be our wrecker.'
`Had your master gray hair?' asked Harry, eagerly.
`Yes, young massa.'
`Had he lost any one of his fingers?' asked Harry,
with singular discretion, so as not to put a leading
question, by asking that he meant this should lead to.
`No, not on he hand; but he hab loss one orf he
right foot. I wish he lose em all, and he leg, too, and
den he be like Lobo!'
`It is our man! You are right, Harry. Providence
is in this, be assured, and so take courage. Has your
master been off the Island?'
`Yes, massa, more den week.'
`And he came back to-night?'
`Yah. You know dat! He in you schooner,
and cuss you coz you wreck him, too! Yah, yah,
yah! I larf, coz massa get wreck too. He mos drown.
But he no so drown he no mos killee me, coz I glad,
too, I see de schooner on de reef. He come catch me
larfin, and beatee me like de debbel, till me yell.'
`Where is he?' asked Forrestal, intensely interested,
and hardly able to command that patience necessary to
enable him to get the information he sought. Poor
Harry was almost wild with expectation.
`In de cave, massa.'
`Where is this cave?'
`Ober dere in de cliff,' he answered, pointing.
`Will you take me there in your boat?'
`Massa Ingles kill me.'
`I will protect you. I and these young officers shall
go with me, and these two stout men here, my gunner
and boatswain. We will protect you from the man
you dread, only show us the cave where your master,
the wrecker, has his habitation.'
`But he will set Jover on me!' `Into the boat, and
pull me to the place. If you deceive me, you shall be
slain.' `If you will kill massa, me be you slave?'
`It is your master we want. We are his enemy, but
your friend.' `Den me go show you,' replied Lobo,
with a leer of animal delight that was truly ferocious.
The negro swayed his body to the slender oars, and
pulled the heavily laden boat across the space to the
cliff, and then skirting it, suddenly passed from the
sight of the men on the reef, as it turned into the
passage of `The-Hole-in-the-Wall.'
We briefly conclude our Tale. The young girl was
found, recognized by her brother, and restored to
civilized
society. She was educated, and became the
bride of Forrestal. The old man refused to divulge
the names of his victims, and, making an attempt on
Harry's life, was killed by Forrestal. Lobo, terrified,
threw himself into the sea. An advertisement in the
English papers brought the mystery to light. `Ingles'
proved to be the natural brother of the Earl of
Taverston
,
the father of Harry and his sister; and revenge, so
far as could be ascertained, alone dictated his conduct
towards his nephew and niece.